Hi, I been a fan of Milovana for a while now, pls send me an invite code in PM. Thanks 
the sun had just dipped down below the curvature of the earth and i floated lazily in the observation deck. i could hear her enter the room, though without gravity it was as if the quality of air had changed rather than footfalls. she was close to me. i could hear her breath. her hand touched mine, only briefly. when her fingers found mine i clasped them and she pulled me close. without the glare of the sun, the stars became a sheet of diamonds. the depth of the eternal night pierced by the tiny flicker of a billion suns. I could feel the goose flesh of her arm as i ran my fingers along her skin. she radiated warmth like a hearth. i drew closer to her as the deepening twilight chilled me. i was terrified and exhilarated. my heart raced and seemed to stop as her lips touched mine. she hunched her shoulders and shivered, sliding closer to me. taking my heat. she seemed to melt into me and i didn't care about anything then. we were everything. the only thing in the world.
Something about gun laws saying you can't have illegal drugs and also carry a gun, so if you have drugs on you you're committing a crime by having a gun. Totally warrants straight-up murder, trust me.
They had to send away to the Hivemind of Epsilon Eridani, they're so complex! That's why they are so late. 
That's fair enough
I love how he appears to be gripping the grass to prevent rolling. 
Twerking is a dance. 
Congrats! The question is:   #To whom does that second ticket belong to?
Chasing the bad pitch and trying to slam it 500 feet.  Manny is developing some bad habits
Absolutely beautiful about time barstool got a nfl podcast
Glad I'm not the only one  Goes so hard and the chorus is fantastic 
Which usually means another cigarette which turns into another hour chilling by the cars. 
This shit is seriously about to make me tear up. I fucking love our Wilf. I can't express how happy I am we got him back
I love these guys! How old is the big guy in the front? I got a little calico fancy in April and it was less than an inch long from nose to tail. Now it's a little chubby golf-ball with fins. It's surprising how much (and how fast!) they grow when you keep them happy.
The highest of quality
Thats what they said.  I think theres a bit of confusion here.
The non-entity disbanding won't make a difference because:  1.  It is a non-entity, there isn't really anything to disband.  Those people came together because they saw the tiny wannabe nazi snowball at the top of a mountain and want to shut it down before it became a big snowball.  Once the snowball is crushed they will all go away on their own.  2.  Calling them a terrorist organization is just a way to vilify all people that counterprotest against the wannabe nazis and will make it easier for Trump to crack down on the counterprotesters.  **This is literally out of the fascist-authoritarian playbook.**
#WELL GOOD EVENING AND WELCOME TO TUCKER CARLSON TONIGHT
&gt;off the reservation  I have never heard this term before, did Hillary use it? I could see how it would piss off tribal people.
I'm getting error 43, I used the patch and the unrooted MEmu (fgo_4.4.ova)
That subreddit is deeply confused and needs a talking to.
Fantastic Four
The antithesis of the compassionate humanitarian the article is about. Kind of funny that a multimillionaire man of god is being shown how to be human by a mattress salesman.
&gt; You will probably never reach ranks higher than yellow  He's already in orange ranks m8
Most likely this, same as the right back issue.  We're now one Valencia injury/suspension away from being beyond fucked. And we have to watch Blind play leftback and cross it, or hope Shaw manages to stay healthy and become the player we've been waiting him to be for years.
Do the Red Sox have a SCOUTS justice in their fan section? I don't think so!
He's probably talking about Ash's Charizard, which quit listening to him for some reason after it became a Charmeleon.  When the show Pokemon first aired in the United States, it was owned by UPN and only aired episodes up until Charmander evolved into Charmeleon. Over and over kids would watch, eagerly awaiting to see if this would be the time the show would move forward, because this was the first time since Butterfree that Ash had a long time pokemon of his evolve. Eventually the show was transferred to another channel and the dub continued.  And what happened? Charmeleon was a piece of shit. It was very disturbing because Charmander up until that point had been nothing but a friendly and loyal pokemon to Ash, the latter having done nothing to deserve ire. Charmeleon still didn't improve when it became a Charizard. Charizard was lazy, and never wanted to fight unless it thought the opponent was "worthy" of challenging, despite Charizard itself not being skilled at all.   The worst event was when Charizard cost Ash his Indigo League match. Team Rocket had kidnapped Ash before his match, and he was forced to use his good pokemon in order to escape and reach the stadium before he was disqualified. Since Ash was not offered to reschedule his match, he was forced to compete with half a roster, and ultimately had to resort to sending Charizard out. Charizard did not give a shit, and since it would not fight Ash automatically forfeited the match.   It wasn't until an entire season later that Charizard realized what a weak piece of shit it was after it nearly died when it got its ass kicked by a Poliwrath after Charizard kept trying to use flamethrower on it like a dumbass. It took Ash nursing it back to health for it to finally stop being such a shithead. But during the next season, they came across a valley of strong Charizards. Instead of getting his Charizard strong with his own ability, Ash left his Charizard there to "train" and he calls for it every now and then whenever he needs a strong pokemon to save his ass.  It didn't take literally eight seasons, but Charmander evolved at the end of episode 43 and quit being a shit during episode **107** and left Ash during episode 136.
That is certainly a factor.  Another factor, I think, is the incredible pressure you are put under to look your best at all times, even into old age.
Yep, happened to me yesterday in destiny 1
Thanks. Do you find yourself spending more or less money when it comes to maintaining staggered wheels?
you can hire whomever you want for either job.   when choosing a buyers agent, do be sure to interview several before choosing, you may want to interview some other listing agents too, just to see what's out there.  you have no obligation to use the same agent for both transactions. best of luck w/the sale and purchase!
The flows pretty sick brother. Dope stuff. I would have liked for the mixing to be slightly better though. I think that's my problem too.
https://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/gender  &gt;1: [grammar stuff]  &gt;2: sex
His inability to emote and his complete lack of charisma make him a bad actor. 
I have been playing mostly McCree and some Ana and Sombra for pratice. These are my favourite heroes. Playing Ana in DM is really tough but so good for my mechanics. From what I can see around my level, Roadhogs, Tracers and Junrats are the strongest (at least in the new map).  But I have also seen a lot of Reapers and some Hanzos/Widow doing really well. For me the hero that annoys me more is Junkrat. So frustrating :/ 
The original discussion was about how a new $30k 370Z is a poor performance value relative to other cars but if we're talking about the cheapest way to make power I would just buy a 2012 GT for ~18k, drop $10k on a Helion Setup and be at $28k for 1,200hp. 
If you like it and would like to have it as a gem in a piece of jewellery, look up Heather Gems. They're quite pretty.
Stop say thank you so much and don't walk away.  *thank you.* *walks away**
Tank isn't just threat. It's threat + body.   Roadhog is (was) a tank because he tempted you to shoot his 600+ hp instead of shooting his squishy buddies. Its 1) a lot easier to hit roadhog, 2) a lot easier to farm ult charge off Roadhog, and if you kill him, 3) you remove a huge threat and 4) it's a great way to stagger their team because of how slow he is. These are all excellent reasons for prioritizing Roadhog in a teamfight that turn Roadhog into a tank whether the player playing him wants to be one or not.  Now that he has 900 hp 300 of which has dmg mitigation, why shoot him? You can't kill him anyway, he takes a long ass time to kill you, might as well go after the enemies you *can* kill instead. That is literally the exact opposite of a tank. Oops.
And then, Imagine, not getting her. 
However, it is a right to not be subject to discrimination in employment based on protected classes, e.g. sexual orientation. In my opinion, this right should be extended to prohibit discrimination based on gender identity as well. 
This allows people to only plug in their phones or other USB powered devices which don't use that much power. If you introduce a power plug then people can plugin their laptops, or even a microwave if they had one with them and that would drain the battery powering all these USB ports in minutes.  Typical phone charger uses 5W of electricity per hour meanwhile a laptop charger typically uses around 75W. That's 15x more than a standard phone. So a person charging their laptop on the bus for 1 hour is equivalent to 15 people charging their phones for 1 hour.
What would you like I only do priority with juice because it's safer in a box and it gets over 1lb real quick. I'll do first class if it's less than 1lb. 
making money lol.   i understand people really like crass for what they stood for way back when, but they quickly ditched that and went for the money. a lot of people blame only Steve ignorant, but more then him had a part in everything...
Trying as hard as we can to get them out quickly. Demand is high for Travel Kits, so we build those first, then the attachments. We're hoping in the next week or two. 
It's here
but how else would you get fake internet points 
Just listen to me . starts working out and go to the nazi parades . recently one was in berlin 
Granted, but that shouldn't stop any GM from seeking advice to ensure they're going about thing in the most optimal way possible! ;p
I have no steep hills in my country. What do i do now
I do dress well. 
Goodbye
Don't think about it too much... don't think about it too much...
Actually JUST received it on my coinbase at long last. Thanks a million guys!;
God would I love Folk to hit a 50+ yarder.  I almost forgot what it feels like for a Bucs kicker to make those. 
Wow that looks amazing!
He reminds me a little of Norm from cheers 
They usually deliver it to your home address via Fedex.
Wait I'm behind. Why is Nadal seeded first and Federer only seeded 3rd?
To counter stepping up on targeting, NCAA has decided to get rid of pass interference penalties
spray paint on a stick is very stealth.
was this cross posted?
That would never, ever, ever happen. Brock is virtually worthless, and Robinson is worth a first rounder or more.  You guys are going to be really disappointed if your expectations are this high.
Its taking too long for shit like this to blow up in their faces. But it will one day, and I cant wait.
I was fascinated that y'all have "76" gas stations there. Haven't seen one of those in a minute!
Archived for your convenience  Snapshots:  1. *This Post* - [archive.org](https://web.archive.org/20170901000000/http://www.whas11.com/mobile/article/news/health/new-app-in-nc-allows-minors-to-order-birth-control-online-without-parents-knowing/469542301), [_megalodon.jp\*_](http://megalodon.jp/pc/get_simple/decide?url=http://www.whas11.com/mobile/article/news/health/new-app-in-nc-allows-minors-to-order-birth-control-online-without-parents-knowing/469542301 "could not auto-archive; click to resubmit it!"), [archive.is](https://archive.is/x1S3M)  *^(I am a bot.) ^\([*Info*](/r/SnapshillBot) ^/ ^[*Contact*](/message/compose?to=\/r\/SnapshillBot))*
Google "gypsy cops" for many other articles on the topic.
I tell ya hwut
Spriggs is fucking awful
Really... There may not be an issue at all then!
Did you do co-op? 
[Yeah](http://i.imgur.com/tVTaduT.png), [too many](http://imgur.com/a/RH6KE) pointless steps here.
Le EBIN rick and marty reference? TAKE MY UPBOAT xDxD
Ask someone to photoshop fix that.
Fucking lol
Chris Davis, Adam Jones, and Mark Trumbo for me. Trumbo ended up hitting both a home run and a triple during a game at the Polo Grounds.
What about a 4-3-3 false 9? 
I think that looks shit and doesn't fit Overwatch's style.  Cyberion or her SG skins are way better.
It will be here : [Ohio State vs Indiana Live Stream!](https://www.reddit.com/r/ncaaliveonlinefree/) =  , video starts 30-50 mins before game free
Was this in the airport? Late night airport workers at MIA are notoriously Spanish-only, though obviously Miami itself has a ton of people who primarily speak Spanish.
The vultures like to swoop in and scavenge when the warriors are away on missions. Well done and well written 
On his day that guy could really light up the map. 
I mean, he *was* convicted of securities fraud, so I feel that my description of him as a "convicted fraudster" is pretty accurate.
what area do you deadlift at? I've been caught on the first floor where the view is of the parking structure
Same principle in judo! If you just have one throw people learn to defend it pretty quickly!
A c t u a l l y  p l e a s e  d o
I've been listening to WBRU since I was old enough to beg my parents to change the station. Or at least since I got bored of Radio Disney haha. Thank you so much WBRU. Does anyone know if the summer concert series will continue?
my friend's idea for a food truck is 'five buck fried rice' where he just makes fried rice and it's 5 bucks. I dunno how much that would be in USD, I guess like 3 bucks but it doesn't sound as good.
God forbid they write using some entertaining language huh 
Same me too. What I'm fearful of is the player base dying out, because when a player base dies out the money shortens and I've seen that turn a lot of apps to pay2win :(. I agree with trying out different things to see what sticks. That's why I'm not against the added layers of the bunker but to see if it sticks they need to help out the player with like differential armor, otherwise the player will become upset and not even know if they like it or not. I like how you point things out like their game progression through each update and that is a good way to go about the creation of the game. That's what I didn't like about the 1 star this is boring reviews as the devs won't exactly know whats "sticking" and whats not and whats important and what isn't.
XRL, ICN, OMG, ZRX. And DYODD.
Fantastic guys ordered the parts to finish my upper from them (barrel,rail, bcg) and when the box arrived it was torn open in shipping.  Called them on a Saturday answered right away and had replacement parts to me by the first of the week.  All parts have functioned flawlessly.  Would not hesitate to buy from them again. 
i dont follow the lore much is this hoe widows house?
I don't know about that call.
We need a lot more info here but I already am seeing a few issues.  Let's start with the truck itself:  1) $35K for this truck is fucking insanity if it has airbag deployment on the Carfax.  As a general rule an accident is 10-15% off the value of a vehicle.  Airbag deployment?  30% or more.  So, for $35K I would say, yeah maybe, IF the truck was fixed well and IF it's a 2006 Crew Cab 4WD Denali.  Maybe.  That truck, if it's a Crew Cab is worth, IMO, $23-24K as a trade in with that history.  So let's start there.  Also, is this a Crew or Double cab or regular cab?  And yes, they said whatever you wanted to hear to get you in the door, that's their job.  So...  Need more info on the truck.  On your Honda.. How's the history on that?  Also, what kind of Civic is it, what kind of shape, how many miles and roughly where are you located?  Let's start there and then we will move on to plan B.
Looks like his mom. 
I'm pretty sure that's not true for everyone.
It is tacti-cool not tacti-lame!
Pretty spot on
Phone Dialer Bug. I'm on T-Mobile and the only calls that should be labeled as HD are those made to other T-Mobile numbers with compatible phones (and answered with that phone. A forwarded call to VM for example is not HD).   The DirecTV 800 number is not one of these HD voice phones, but the screenshot below shows the HD icon on the call screen.   [http://i.imgur.com/sIc8vmX.jpg](http://i.imgur.com/sIc8vmX.jpg)  Edited for clarity
I only clicked because I wanted to know what an ermine was.
Yep. But it happened to me on all the other maps before so its nothing Theme Park specific.
Wala akong anak.
Thank you for sharing this very important information with us. From this day onwards I will always remember that panda is a Randia stooge.
if men in video games can be buff Adonises hand chiseled from marble, i don't see why women cant be sexy too
Asian and White for me, with some light skin black people too
I agree, and I'll admit I always forget about her when people start spouting off names of gorgeous women. Sorry Sarah :(
He hates Indians too. Remember that casino ad? That's why he loves Jackson so much.
My problem is at that point just get a chevy. Im fairly sure its the same motor and frame but cheaper because its not a caddy
I always thought it was silly you could trip over someone and not be able to attack them. You would think making physical contact would reveal them. Its so frustrating to be able to see and stand on top of another hero and suffer from not having the right tools available to even engage them.
"You won't mess anything up, ma'am, I'm sure" he said submisively, realising her rank.
Looks like someone is watching the Unambomber TV series...
**Spoiler Warning:** [EVERYTHING] means spoilers from normal media sources do not need spoiler tags. If you are concerned about spoilers, leave this thread immediately.  The one exception is that S7 production/filming spoilers are NOT currently allowed in [EVERYTHING] threads. They can only be posted in threads marked with [S7 Production]. For more info please check the [spoiler guide](/r/gameofthrones/w/spoiler_guide).  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/gameofthrones) if you have any questions or concerns.*
PMing you
That last sentence is so fucked up. 
Cool with me.
You're welcome! It can be hard to find good info on fibroids - it seems like they're pretty common, but unless they're large or painful, most people never even know they have them. Feel free to ask me questions if you think of anything. And thank you! :)
Ship Breaker by Paolo Bacigalupi?
**Converted Taobao Links:**  https://item.taobao.com/item.htm?id=546645500093  **********  [^(I am a bot)](https://www.reddit.com/r/FashionReps/comments/5r3p1i/psa_im_a_taobao_link_converter_bot_please_read/)^(. Please use https://taobaotools.github.io to convert your links.)
wow comment tu fais ?
My country doesnt even have jlpt lol
Seth in streetfighter 4. 
/r/shitbikes
That was really something.
&gt; or can read  lol
Did you get the memo?
Manila on as4 would add to the already awesome predicted lineup of mainly top3 and fan favourites - shea, trinity Taylor, kim chi, Naomi smalls, Valentina, pearl, adore, willam, Courtney with Manila making 10 
Christ. The implication that Chisaki has killed and brought Eri back to life multiple times with his quirk. The absolute certainty with which he plans to do it again if necessary. Fucking spooky. 
The Ruins theme from Undertale.  https://youtu.be/VT9BfLVbnI8
At no point would I ever take that. I'd rather wait another year for the album than for that shit. 
Added finishedposting 
&gt; Like, I've no clue how you could believe that logo was real, or that it would have been leaked in the first place. :P  Yeah, I mean we are on Nerdcubed's subreddit right? The same Nerdcubed who made a half hour video saying he was handing the channel over to Ashens *just* to fuck with his fans?
Warren dive rolls to his right, turning himself around as he did, rifle ready.
310 528 300  Diablos w/ 2x machine killers
Yep. This is exactly why i hunt for bras that fit
I want a recolor of the winged victory skin quite badly - support.
This raid has been automatically cleaned up. --- ^(Raid Title Format: *[Raid] Pokemon @ Location*)   ^(I'm a bot! Please report any issues to my creator) [^here](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=12px)^.
CURSE THAT STUPID HEDGEHOG
I can't even get into a relationship...
That's quite a leap you've taken.  My friend has access to nudes of his wife. I've enlisted him to help on some projects around my house, but that does not mean I now have nudes of his wife.
I haven't D: I wouldn't know how to get tested. 
Here's the thing: Based on what I've read in the Bible, heaven is almost a temporary place for us. There's a New Jerusalem coming where we'll all live, and it'll be life, but with no sin, glorified bodies, and there won't be any natural light because Christ's glory will be our light. It sounds as though this New Jerusalem will almost be like a new garden of Eden, where we'll do life, walk with God, but sin will not exist anymore, the devil will have been cast into the lake of fire, so essentially a perfect world. I'd love to hear arguments for and against this. And of course, we'll praise God there 
On David Letterman
I do think they oversold the day of the preorder my last 4 they canceled 1  2 and 4 but not number 3 an hour after they were ordered. I have not had another one cancel yet.  If they cancel more oh well.  Seems at the rate they are canceling if they didn't oversell 30% of the preorder stock should be still available after cancellations.
jokic is a point god tho
You chirping the pats, bud?
I think you're looking at shit that ain't there. You should be more concerned about Asian women sticking white cocks in their mouths.
This looks lovely! Can you share the recipe for the seasoned tofu?
McGloin is perfect for evaluating your running backs' receiving skills, and not much else
Sure no disrespect taken. I'm only working a few days currently. Not short on money as I have moved from a tech to mostly sales in the security field, but I'm bored so my intuition lead me here to get some insight before I meet with them tomorrow. They do have a storefront and are involved in commercial jobs. 
It depends on the city, really. Some are very dog friendly. 
Master Calculator, master every spellcaster class, play as a Summoner with Calculator 2nd. Op as fuck.
I can't anymore you people are insane like how do you even get to conclusions like that you have to be trolling me. And I am just falling right into the trap damn
I'm going to say it and I mean it but Ami is way better than Taiga.
Yup got into Northeastern as well. I come from a town out in Western Mass so had no desire to be in the city so Northeastern was never somewhere I wanted to go. Parents made me apply
Kill me first.
They were not under investigation when she requested they be deleted. So what did she do wrong?
Shame he wasn't at his best following his permanent move, he was the absolute boss in his loan season
h i g h  i n t e l l e c t  b a s e d
It's Georgia State was this really unexpected?
When I "have" to log in everyday just to stay caught up
Pretty sure this is the most we know.   Given almost all knowledge of MK ULTRA was destroyed with Watergate, we really only have a handful of boxes (if that) of files that didn't get destroyed.  
Gamers is one of my favorite shows this season, but I don't know if I'd consider it a **rom**com.  More like a misunderstandingcom.
For me it's about even, but most importantly we've got some wing back depth, and a lot of young players who will serve us well for the years to come 
Mate, just rip out a solid "Any of you lads wanna crack a tinny and go Waltzing Matilda" and they'll be fucking all over you. 
I dunno...I'm not a scientist, but a quick google search says:  Dawn dish soap does kill fleas. It works by reducing the surface tension of water. Fleas sink and drown instead of remaining on the water’s surface. The dish detergent also prevents insects’ waxy cuticles from repelling water. As a result, water can enter their respiratory system to suffocate them
Tagged
I love hearing how confident you all are about what you need in your relationships. For the longest time I believed there was something wrong with me because I wanted a porn free relationship. I felt confident and happy with myself, but I thought there must be some hidden issues. I tried so hard to change my feelings around porn in my relationship. I couldn't understand why I couldn't just accept it.  But in the end I realized it was simply an issue of attraction. I am not attracted to partners who want porn in a relationship. I don't think there is anything wrong with that. If someone wants porn in their relationship than me and that person aren't compatible. They aren't bad, I'm not bad, we just aren't a good match. There are many reasons why two good people don't work out. This is just one of those to me. I wish I realized I had the right to these feelings earlier in life. 
Do you own a bike? I see you post all the time and it always gets downvoted. 
**Superstar SM cancels planned Girls' Generation event, developers say there's "nothing they can do"**  https://www.allkpop.com/upload/2017/08/af_org/31182017/Girls-Generation.jpg   If you're playing the mobile app game 'Superstar SM' then you will know that many people in the player base were really looking forward to the new theme packs and events for Girls' Generation's 10th-anniversary.  However, the people who were looking forward to this have been given the news that the theme packs and events have been cancelled. On the official subreddit for the game, the developers posted, "Event &amp; New Theme - Cancelled." When a redditor replied, "Event &amp; New Theme - Cancelled...for this week right? (ఠ్ఠ ˓̭ ఠ్ఠ) It will be next week?" The developers said, "There is nothing Dalcomsoft can do... (╥﹏╥)."  Many of the players are upset as they saved their diamonds (in-game currency for purchases) to purchase the Girls' Generation theme packs. One player, emailed Dalcomsoft and received the following response: I asked them if it's because of their contracts . Even they don't know if sm will allow them to update All Night Lol dear sm you really can choke . . . #SuperstarSMTown #SuperstarSM #SSM #GirlsGeneration #SNSD #TAEYEON #SUNNY #TIFFANY #HYOYEON #YURI #SOOYOUNG #YOONA #SEOHYUN #KimTaeyeon #LeeSoonKyu #StephanieHwangMiyoung #KimHyoyeon #KwonYuri #ChoiSooYoung #ImYoonA #SeoJuHyun #GIRLS6ENERAT10N #HolidayNight A post shared by #HolidayNight (@charites.ssm) on Aug 29, 2017 at 11:18pm PDT Many of the players are wondering if SM is purposely doing this and blocking Girls' Generation due to the ongoing contract renewal situation. What are your thoughts on the situation?  Girls' Generation   https://www.allkpop.com/upload/2017/08/content/Girls-Generation_1504217261_1__1_.jpg https://www.allkpop.com/upload/2017/08/content/Girls-Generation_1504217261_2__1_.jpg   *****  *I am a bot that transcribes allkpop articles.*
Yes! It's also great for not waking up your partner since it's just vibrating on your wrist. Now if only I didn't knock everything over...
Cmon man
It's amazing that a century of unprecedented economic growth and productivity gains has resulted in... $20 trillion of public debt alone, D- infrastructure, and most people living paycheck to paycheck, working just as many hours as ever for declining purchasing power.  What exactly was the point of economic/productivity growth again?  Do extremely wealthy people really want to watch their country crumble around them so they can have an even more absurdly gigantic amount of money?  I doubt it, but I don't think anyone knows how to turn the machine off at this point.
Single mother household, Ghetto crime &amp; 3 hots and a cot ;)  Source: It's a family tradition(Just not necessarily mine)
Asia sure had me spoiled. That sort of burger would be  shy of $5 no coupon.
I have a clear window feeder and the other day I noticed a big lump in it. I knocked on the glass and nothing, no movement. I went out to the patio and saw that it was a sparrow. I thought it had to be dead because I was inches from it and yet it remained still. I said yo, wassup and it opened its eyes, squawked and flew away.
+ awesome, can I ask you to upload it using cubeupload.com....imgur tends to squash the quality a bit
I'm going to the last night with a friend, driving from PA
&gt; “Now there are adults without children who go to Disney, and they are called weirdos. Very nice people. Absolutely crazy.”  - Jim Gaffigan
Sniper who can turn invisible. Every kids' dream.
Does she know she has a stalker? 
I clicked on this because of the thumbnail. Was disappointed.  I will retaliate to this by creating the following, in under 1 minute, based on the movie I am watching now:  http://imgur.com/a/FkXbp
Part of me thinks something is in the air.  I've had a few breakouts of a magnitude I almost never see and I have no idea why.  One of those suckers is determined to hang on, so after a week of putting up with him I've decided I can go get that pink stuff tomorrow.  Not helpful for you, but I'm definitely feeling your sad face pain.  :(  I hope you find tons of extra product in the tube!
Can someone list all the spots you can find Gladio flirting with the ladies? Where does he go after the last girl?
me me big disappointment 
Yeah, i only get gear that drops in the world anyways
.......
I love when movies do shit like this 
I was playing Silent Hill 2. I was on the fourth floor of the hospital, fleeing from Pyramid Head and trying to protect Maria. I'm walking backward, opening up with the shotgun, when Maria flings herself between me and Pyramid Head, straight into my line of fire.  I stared blankly at the game over screen, popped the disc and NEVER went back to it. Because fuck that shit. Escort and protect missions suck enough without the AI committing fucking suicide.
I would depending on the price. I dont want to pay much for a 2 month rental.
If you got the tms to burn then it's fine.
Syracuse already has NYC's One True Billboard market covered.
I wasn't going to die of thirst.
Great video, kinda suspected that it was pointless. Side note, the C7E should not have burst mode at all since there is only 3 fire modes on M16 pattern rifles.
Don't go to public discussion forums if you don't want to hear what's being said there. It's not a first amendment issue. It's common sense. 
Probably sucks anyway
Cheers to you too :-D Have a good weekend. 
Tastes like a boxed cake lol. 4/10
Think 8 will be fine for now. Can always purchase another stick down the road. 
This hole was made for me!
Why are you being a dick to the other guy?
woo pigs!!! been too long of an offseason after that atrocious bowl. Lets do this!
I don't necessarily agree that the AUDL's job or intent is to promote men's ultimate. I think they're trying to promote the "sport" of ultimate by the means at their disposal. Which happens to be men's ultimate. I also don't think they're claiming to represent that they're "all of ultimate". The same way I wouldn't assume that the NBA represents "all of basketball". 
You have 10 seconds to decide.
Because saying you're in one of the top ranks in MM sounds cooler than being C rank on esea.
Seaweed -- This could be done several ways, depending on the needs of the narrative and the preferences of the player. What I'd have done is framed it as Creating and Advantage (Will opposed by Athletics or similar) to stick a **Bound in Seaweed!** aspect on the target, with the Overcome difficulty needed to get out of it equal to the shifts of success the caster had on the first roll.  &gt;I had to dial things down and say she could put aspects on people to incline them to act one way or another, but to have FULL control over someone, she'd have to "take them out" in mental combat.  This is basically how [This Secrets of Cats](http://www.drivethrurpg.com/product/134533/The-Secrets-of-Cats-o-A-World-of-Adventure-for-Fate-Core) does it, and it works just fine there, so I'd say you're on the right track.  In their case, invoking or compelling consequences inflicted during the mental conflict represents seizing momentary control over the creature you're trying to dominate, and if you Take them Out, you gain full control.
and ups
I'd say yes, but also get Persona 3. (FES not Portable) Persona 3 is still my favorite game in the series, because of all the different mechanics. Most people hated these, but I liked the lack of direct commands and the reversible social links. Having no direct commands made it much more strategic in my opinion, because you would have to constantly switch tactics between different party members at different times. And the reversible social links made it a little more challenging because then you can't just do what you want and be a major asshole. But Persona 4 Golden was also a great game, I just like Persona 3 better.
Sure gene splicing and making fruits in a lab would be very questionable on the safety. There is a store here in California where you can buy hybrid fruit grown in a lab that I am very concerned about actually eating most of it.   The only thing I have tried from said market, I don't remember the name, is the grape/orange hybrid fruit just to get an understanding of why people eat any of this. It actually taste really good and these hybrid fruits a lot of these items make very convenient snacks. At this point you would have to split GMO itself into 2 categories accepted and non-accepted but, as of right now GMO covers any messing with the gene pool not just artificially in a lab.
How long before Gucci men's large restock?
Lordy
Practice,Practice,practice and practice
Honestly any game that forces a gameplay change for a mission. If I wanted to do a stealth mission I would have played a game that focused on it...
&gt; En hoewel ik vind dat Jan zich misdraagt, durf ik omdat hij zo boos is niets uit te brengen   Jammer, juist dan moet je wat zeggen. Zeker als je het oneens bent met hoe die vent je eigen partij leidt.
"Those puny ants outnumber us a hundred to one.  And if they ever figure that out, there goes our way of life! ... It's not about food, it's about keeping those ants in line." - Hopper, A Bugs Life
TIFU by indirectly bombing people
I know. It's the thing I call the "Apple sphere". You start out with your first device, and then because of all the proprietary crap that Apple has, along with their tactics to keep things exclusive to only them and not letting any other brands chip in, you end up buying another Apple device, as it's the only real option. This continues until you are where you are now.  You obviously also start using Apple's software, as it's the only things that are properly supported on said Apple devices. These things can't be used on other devices, so once again you have no good option of trying something else.  It's this way with everything Apple does, and it is for a very good reason, profits. They earn massive amounts of money by funneling people to their products exclusively.  I really dislike this. Other brands want you to buy their products too, but at least you have legitimate options with Android and stuff like Windows. You aren't chained to the whole ecosystem in the same way.  Does this sound somewhat like your experience? 
I do full face glam daily. I can do my full face in less than 15 minutes if I'm really pressed, but I usually take 30 to 45 minutes every morning because it makes me feel better. 
I have a cousin in a homosexual relationship. There is not a doubt in my mind they truly love and care for each other. That doesn't change the fact that sex is supposed to be between a man and a woman. You're right: life sucks, but that's kind of the point. You drudge through misery and pain, and if you've stuck with God by the end of it, you get to feel His love for eternity (obviously that's an over simplification of all of that, but I'm sure you get the point). 
No beer fridge?
roar is nice,  but bristling fur is also a perfect answer to fel claw, their charge is amazing for the knockback their artifact actually prevent them from being knockback, which is also amazing on P3...  Guardian just have a very good answer to every tank mechanic on KJ AND provide the best utility in the form of roar.
Shovel yourself out of the shit!
also u never said anything on my last post lol
downvote me if you want but seriously with 99 not getting his shit together Worthy is valuable
That's not even mildly humorous, that's just poor taste.
Johnny Walker, Black, neat
Yeah, once you've drunk the Kool-aid that carbon is beyond evil, you've got to reduce it at all costs.  These people probably abhor the use of kitchen matches.
Always right and triple if possible. What kind of a peasant are you?
Hi, there Adam. You've forgotten to add a gender tag e.g. [F4M] it helps performers know that you want a female to fill your request. :) I hope someone fills this out for you. 
I just really hope they keep the quality as it is and offer up to date market trends (bezels, bigger phone offerings, etc) Hearing about how they lowered their costs on their parts makes me worry.
Cant find the patch note .. ubi site is the worst ... it still says to watch pro league to get info .. its like a 10employees conpany ..
This submission has been removed. New accounts are restricted to posting to the following sites [i.imgur.com, gfycat.com]. Please note that links to imgur must be direct image links (e.g. https://i.imgur.com/abcdefg.png).  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/voluptuous) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Dude....look closer. That's Jesus! 
 Little pupper, big ol HOLY SHIT RUN
If you catch him talking to her again, I really recommend taking a step back and thinking about if this relationship is worth continuing if you can't trust your bf to not talk to his ex that he lies to you about.
Hmm, I thought a new set of quests would unlock soon, is it Friday/Saturday?
&gt;niggercucks  OMG, Becky. He said it, im like supes offended. How am i gonna go about my day now. 
Fairly. Can you find a case of its use?
Seems like you've done all you can for figuring out what is happening. You're seeing a specialist already, we are not doctors here so we can't help you determine what is happening. You have your doctor for that.   We can, however, share any experiences we have which I'll allow. Any sort of diagnosis will be removed.  Sorry, hope you feel better.
They'll eventually be kept in a museum and digital scans will be available on the Internet.  I think they are going to be that important.
Whatcha gonna do when they come for you.
Not just more sensitivity, but also more complex types of stimulation.
No way we put Neymar on the right wing. Mbappe would play there before Neymar for certain
Ok, biggest hole in your team is that you dont have a SPR buffer. You can get by with not having a MAG buffer if you're not using MAG based DDs, but not having a SPR buffer can mean Game Over. Ashe can complement Refia really well with Meditate+Embolden, can deal magic damage, heal/clean ailments and somewhat chains with Fohlen if Im not mistaken.  After Ashe, 9S is a good choice if you want to use EV instead of WoL.
Sounds interesting. I'm all for it, I just hope it wouldn't take too much from the developers. As long as gameplay isn't sacrificed at all, and story affected as little as possible, then I'm all for it  I'd love to do an all Clarence run.
If your doctor thinks it's best, then do it! I'm not supposed to go out till 9/22 when I'm 38 weeks but I don't know if I will make it that long... thankfully neither does my boss, so it won't be a shocker if I don't make it! 
At that stage he is 30, we will move on.
I started hating her the first time I came to Riverwood. She is an obvious alpha bitch from the get go.
I NEED EX. PLS!! LOL - "you play marth?!!? WEEB!!" 
Would be NICE if you could post a link to that meme since OBVIOUSLY everyone has not seen it. 
How outgoing they are. I try so hard to be bubbly when I first meet people because despite usually being loud and annoying, I freeze up around strangers and my voice goes monotonous and I sound so boring and UGH.   Usually if the other person is quite shy, I'll try extra hard to open up a dialogue.
Be happy you didn't buy the expansions. It was just more grinding with copy-pasted bosses and they changed the leveling system with each DLC so old players that spend hours grinding for good shit were the suddenly equally geared and leveled to someone who spent a third of the time (mostly just finishing the story) after the update. The price for the game and expansions I paid doesn't even compare to the time I wasted in it before realizing it was never getting better.
Dragon Warrior on NES
I mean, I have had multiple throwaway accounts before that I have used for completely mundane shit so it could very well be nothing significant
The funny thing is that if we benched every player this idiot has shit on, we wouldn't be able to field a team.
Bending what rules? The team only plays during the day because the city mandates it not the league.  The league obviously has no issue.
/u/Ben_Douglass is slightly positive. [view results](http://ruadick.com/user/Ben_Douglass/) - Ranked #69204 of 127411"
You're being paranoid.
I love HEB, we don't have one close anymore!
Ripley
I see the notification. I was trying to make a joke about getting messages from ads..
I'm a self-employed day trader working from home and enjoy my job. I'm in a situation where I don't have to worry about money. I'm financially comfortable. Do I still feel depression though? Sure. Depressed enough to want to kill myself when I was a wage slave or a NEET? Definitely not. But depressed nonetheless. Money is very important but it is not everything. When I buy things that make me feel better like buying a new laptop, a new phone, ice cream, pizza, Chinese takeout, etc. I feel better temporarily. But then I go back to feeling depressed.  In my life there are three different states: temporary happiness, comfortably numb and stressed. My life was a wage cuck was mostly stress with some temporary happiness sprinkled in. My life as a NEET was comfortable numbness sprinkled with temporary happiness but also feeling a lot of worry in the back of my mind about what I was going to do for money in the future (stress). Now my life now that I have money is mostly comfortably numb with some temporary happiness.
I miss my Gamecocks getting this first Thursday game under Spurrier.  It was so nice to enjoy the rest of the weekend with little anxiety after a win so enjoy it Buckeyes ( or Hoosiers).
Yeah that's it. 
I could but that's less enjoyable. I enjoy eating popcorn and drinking a soda while watching a movie. The problem is those things now cost so much more than doing them at home or doing something else I enjoy. I would gladly spend $10-15 on going to a theater and buying the snacks. Once it stays pushing $20+ there begin to be other things I would rather spend that money on. $10-12 for just the movie isn't really worth it to me either. Maybe it is to you,  but I'm different and seeing that the article is about the decline of theater chains there seem to be many people that agree with me. 
The Blackberry KeyOne has a physical keyboard!
I didn't make it past the title.
SCOTUS decided that the Trump administration was likely to prevail on the merits with the travel ban.  There is no reasonable legal case to be made that the transgender military ban was unlawful, unless you want to argue that the policy that was in place for 7 years of the Obama presidency was unconstitutional.
They are obligated to make money. That's it. Any laws they break can be handled by the courts. Our very efficient and timely court system...
Estimated 1RM then.
**Kazuma**  -------------------  "Well, his plan had worked, the creature seemed to be choking on the glue. What he didn't expect, however, were the babies that seemed to also have money. Instead of thinking the deer could perform magic tricks, he simply assumed that this was some kind of genetic thing. Either way, he was still in pretty high spirits."  "Let's fucking go King Fawn!"  *As the deer turning to rage and charged at him, Kazuma decided to hinder its movements. A charging deer was one that would probably go in a straight line. Dropping another glue ball right behind him and roll out of the at what he'd assume to be the last second, hoping to make it run right over that one and get stuck in its tracks.*
So basically fortify but you give it to someone else? 
I've been caught car hopping twice and been charged with 1 felony and 3 misdimeanders but I'm under 18 and in Canada  so they don't even care
Price?
Something as simple as a weapon wheel would make console weapon swapping less of a pain. 
We have not adopted the Swedish approach. We merely have a governing structure that chooses not to do what it supposedly exists to do.
ofc [Dice Tower](https://www.youtube.com/user/thedicetower)
Just curious, what other places have you interned at to get an interview for Jane Street?
Why the fuck would you risk your hillbilly car that you obvious spent every dollar of minimum wage and welfare on to save a government truck???  Dumbest retards in Texas I swear to god.  "HEY JOEBOB LETS SAVE THIS TRUCK TO SAVE TAXPAYERS SOME MONEY!!!!"
DON'T LET BEING UNDER A MINUTE FROM KICKOFF DISTRACT YOU FROM THE FACT THAT TEXAS LOST TO KANSAS  GOOO BUCKEYES!
Holy shit I just looked at your post history LOL.  You've tried to start like 5 threads in the past 3 days ... all of em downvoted to zero.  Hahahaha and you're giving me lectures on karma? You poor guy.  You just want to be liked.  But zeros left and right hahaha.  Youre trying so hard but no one likes your idiotic thoughts or ideas.  "Kevin Nash should be GM of 205 live"   Holy fuck.  You deserve to be getting ignored like you are, I havent seen a poster oblivious as you in a long time. 
Ah no my brothers watching it first and he's gonna tell me if it's worth my time lol. But thanks for the suggestion I'll keep that in mind too! 
can i french kiss those lips
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Libertarian_socialism
Potentially I should update it in the light of the story revelations...
?
***Welcome to /r/edc_raffle, please read the rules in the sidebar.***  **General rules for this raffle:**  **1.** Please comment to request slot(s). Only TOP COMMENTS count. No replies to comments or automod. OP will reply to your comment to confirm your slot(s).  **2.** Please pay within the timeframe established by OP. If you anticipate you will not be able to pay for your slot(s) in that timeframe, please arrange with OP to pay for your slot(s) early.  **3.** ***The only accepted payment method is PayPal Friends &amp; Family.*** *Do not write anything in the payment notes section.* ***Report to mods anyone that refuses to pay via paypal friends &amp; family***  **4.** After you have paid, please PM OP with the email address associated with your PayPal. Do not publicly post your email address or name.  **5.** All raffles &gt;$150 are approved by mods. Please PM mods with any question of price or authenticity.  ***MODS TRY TO KEEP YOU SAFE BUT SCAMS ARE ALWAYS POSSIBLE, TRUST YOUR GUT***  ***barryhutthole*** details:   1. [/r/raffle_feedback feedback](https://www.reddit.com/r/raffle_feedback/search?q=barryhutthole&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;t=all)  2. [/r/edc_raffle posts](https://www.reddit.com/r/edc_raffle/search?q=author%3Abarryhutthole&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;t=all)  3. [/r/knife_raffle posts](https://www.reddit.com/r/knife_raffle/search?q=author%3Abarryhutthole&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;t=all)  4. [/r/accidentlyraffles posts](https://www.reddit.com/r/accidentlyraffles/search?q=author%3Abarryhutthole&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;t=all)  If modmail is too slow, pm /u/EDCRaffleAdmin /u/EDCRaffleMod or /u/EDCRaffleMod1   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/edc_raffle) if you have any questions or concerns.*
What's he supposed to do? He's covering the best WR in the country, and if they double team him they'll get burned by Johnson or Ateman or Seales or Lacy or hill...the list goes on 
Bacote.
If you like, type up one (or more) of those six questions here and I'll mark that instead/as well.
Yeah. To be honest, I started out with math and stuff and then I realized in the end I was just doing this. And the stupid counters to keep track of how often a bucket was filled and emptied were not really necessary.
Forgiveness can be a tough thing. To forgive does not mean to forget. It doesnt mean that you think what happened never happened. If someone apologizes for something, they have to say what they are apologizing for, what they did wrong, and take responsibility for it and be accountable for whatever harm came from it in a proportionate manner. Then they need to takes steps to ensure it doesnt happen again. Thats what an apology is and contains. Even with all that, it just means they recognize what they did that was hurtful. It doesnt mean everything is all good or that you need to take them back in a relationship. If the apology is only happening to get back what they want, a relationship with you again, its not genuine, its a transaction.   I think you have accepted the relationship is over and are moving in other directions. No Contact needs to be in place and to stay in place. You have already been broken up three times. I know you dont want to lose something that "could" be great, but heres the thing, this isnt great. It never was. You have already tried and ended this relationship multiple times. There isnt some magic that will happen to make this time around great. It just wastes your time and energy.  There is nothing here that is going to make this relationship suddenly work. You have to accept what and who he is and how the relationship has already ended multiple times. There is not going to be some magical thing that happens to make this a life long story book romance of a relationship. And its time to value your time, energy and moving on is the best thing for you. Dont be convinced to come back. You have to move past this and No Contact is how you do it.  
Helmond de anus van Nederland
Did you put her in the moving truck instead?
Maybe they only tell the truth
Sweet. New keeper to shoot!   /Goalcam
Epic fails are never forgotten.  Worse than the falcons in the last Superbowl.
The only time I think you should ever attempt to coach someone is if they ask for advice. I've seen lots of good advice given in game when someone asks for help on how to deal with a tracer as soldier, or how to act with a hero pick they aren't experienced with but made because it fit exceptionally well with the team comp.  However unsolicited coaching almost always just tilts the player your giving advice to. Most people do not like being told what to do, and your critique of their gameplay is going to be awful since you are also (hopefully) concentrating on your own gameplay. Your Winston might have had a very good reason for not diving their supports at that moment in the fight, and he already knows they are a priority for Winston. Trying to coach him about target priority for Winston will likely tilt him, because you are telling him he's not playing correctly... and he might not even agree with your advice.  Many players see someone giving them advice as that person telling them they are shit. By giving out unsolicited advice, you might as well be telling them they are shit, as you're having the same effect on team morale.
Holy shit. How thick is that?
You can replace Xon with 9S (or Cecil, or Firion, or Emperor, or Ashe) and not a thing is lost, not just for this fight, but in general 9S is better.  I don't get the point of Xon, so what if you steal his buff, your stolen buff gets dispel the next turn anyways.  
This thread is teaching me why Pennsylvania has such an opiod issue.  It would appear doses we see all over the place here are cpnsidered insain other places.
As a Houston area Cheesehead, i love this. Good to see any amount donated, especially to JJ's fund.
Have CC4 Zombas, looking for 5 crates
You know what I like about this rise? There are hardly any "moonkids". Everyone is fairly reserved in their approach to ETH's price movement, and I think everyone is a little nervous at these heights. It's... refreshing... albeit a little scary.  Edit: Hahahaha ignore everything I just said. Just read the other reply! 
yes, I knew about her retiring.  Honestly, I love Acid, but from watching her not just on the show but in interviews and periscope it seems pretty obvious why people wouldn't like her...
Don't believe everything you read.  This week, 100 UK negotiators and 47 EU negotiators have been working hard on various issues. The UK have detailed position papers and presentations for all the negotiation sessions, as do the EU.  You might see Davis and Barnier on the TV spinning like crazy, but the real work happens behind the scenes.
Not very disappointing, just slightly disappointing. 
Do you have any ak redline 0.15x? Willing to pay 3k
And if you just want to play the damn game you can find it for $10 or less loose... 
Longest minute I've ever seen. 
Yeah but the dude has real time solvers and a degree in CS
This is weirdly satisfying to watch... am I into dinosaurs?
I used to have a shirt from a nearby Brisbane uni-student watering hole that read "I'd rather be at the RE" (Royal Exchange or RE is the name of the pub).  I used to enjoy wearing it to church.  I'd love to see someone bust one of those bad boys out in court.
&gt; Well look at you generalising an entire population. You must be fun at parties.  I'm talking about the majority. I guess you know what the majority is voting for.
Welcome Everybody , You Have Been Up Voted !!  Feel Free Do The Same , If Not All Good , Catch Me On Da Rebound !! 🏀🏀
But... it does now. Barace does it, both in scrims and even vs iSkys on stream, which is where I'm guessing this thread has come from.
THINK ABOUT THAT.
Hey, are you me? My kids aren't teenagers yet, but they enjoy the archery and crafts, too.
This post was marked as a question and has been removed to reduce clutter. If your question was not answered please repost in the Weekly Questions Megathread or Weekly Team Building Megathread linked at the top of the subreddit
Lol no. The purpose of negative interest is to try and encourage spending by making saving more expensive. Europe has a problem with low inflation which is why they are doing that, same as Japan. 
The way I started learning to like IPAs was by going balls deep and trying a Double IPA. They can be more bitter, but in my experience also have a stronger aromatic and flavorful presence to accompany that bitterness. It really helped me to better understand the role of the bitterness in IPAs.
This is great, the only criticism i have is that the descending bassline that pops in&amp;out every now&amp;then is too prominent in the mix.
Celebrating the outstanding work of fellow 'pede GetToKnowAntifa, I created an adwords adgroup with the above ads.  The ads point to [the URL that is the same as doing a search on The_Donald for #GetToKnowAntifa](https://www.reddit.com/r/The_Donald/search?q=%23GetToKnowAntifa&amp;restrict_sr=on)   This will allow a larger audience to enjoy the tremendous work of a fellow 'pede, while simulataneously driving new traffic to The_Donald, the greatest redpilling site on Earth.   The ads are running in the USA, UK, France, Germany, and Italy :) 
He's basically the gatekeeper to complete the Cubs and the NL Central, so if you keep him that gives you Fergie, PS Schwarber who is a monster, and Pops Stargell. 
Currently Chile are still fourth, on goal difference over Argentina.
Silent, high airflow, $6.67 each.  Choose two.
If I drop out I can become a recluse who roams the country and doesn't have to deal with existing within a community
Once you set it to autohide it asks for time to show and time to hide - so choose a long time to show and a quick time to hide and mess with the settings until it acts like it's gone all the time.
added
Trauma Center: New Blood  Trying to transplant a damn liver while also dealing with 2 different kinds of parasites. 
It's not for everyone. It's generally well researched, but it's ultimately a comedy podcast. Some people don't want to hear jokes about Eric Harris and Dylan Kliebold, so they should steer clear of LPOTL. For those of us who prefer learning about Charles Manson from people who don't paint him as a fucking evil svengali, it's a great show. 
She's a whopper.
So I just tried this and....it's actually pretty decent and works well. The resulting sharpened image is actually pretty good, definitely on par with what we have currently in the live build. Unlike others I don't seem to be seeing the distortions caused by the sharpening.   BUT that is only for the static image.  When in motion, the sharpening introduces a lot of pixelation. It sort of looks like a poorly encoded youtube video. Screenshots won't be able to show this. I'll try get some gameplay capture of this phenomenon. My setting is at 0.25 as recommended, but I think even 0.15 works for me. Maybe it's because I play the game at a very low res (1366 x 768). All in all though, it's still a definite step up from not having this filter at all. I hope the filter can be improved, but even without any improvement, I think most people would still opt to use this filter in its current state than to put up with the blurriness of T-AA. So either way, it would be good to put it into the menu and ship it with the live Season 3 build. Improvements can even come later, after the launch of the season.
The shoe as a whole doesn't look that similar, but damn the soles are nearly exactly the same, I don't get how someone can say they dont looks the same
Do not worry about bringing it up. Communication is so vital to relationships that it is necessary to talk things out. 
No! It doesn't Bing or Buzz either. 
My birth month too! I don't have any plans, but I found out the other day that I'll have the house to myself that weekend so I'm really excited about that. Probably just going to relax and eat a mini cake for dinner, even though my birthday is on a Monday and not part of that actual weekend 😂
Damn villagers casually asking if I can just go fish them the rarest fish possible that season. Ugh! Even worse if it's a villager I really like. I can't NOT do it. :(
TIME FOR FOOTBALL!!!!!!!!
ZERO FUN, SIR 
It speaks to me 
Dacks
There are more Mexican people in L.A. than in Guadalajara. L.A. Is pretty much a Mexican colony. 
That only has a 6-month limit though.
(hoagie)
This song is so beautiful
Si. Y si no pagan amenazan con abstenerse ante cualquier nueva barrabasada del PP. El psoe ha logrado redefinir la democracia, ahora la reorienta hacia el negocio puro y duro. ¿Que será lo siguiente ?.
We don't. The big bang happened last Tuesday, and everything that we know, have known, or will know hasn't existed a second longer than that.
I can't tell if this is sarcasm or not...
Top decks are roughly 400-600 bucks but most of that money is spent on staple cards which can generally be used in every deck unless powercreep or the banlist happens.  The current time is a great time to get into the game, most the major staples just got reprinted and don't look like they're getting power creept for at least a year. The best deck of the format is more than likely going to be hit super hard by konami so there will be a meta change which will start you on level footing with learning the format. There is only 1 playable format as the others are all casual format.   You'll lose money on buying a deck regardless but generally a deck core without staples isn't too much money if you play the market right. A top deck roughly lasts a min of 3 months up to 6 months on average. 
They're becoming sentient. They want out.
I don't quite understand the comparisons here but I trust Ajax to use ziyech money wisely as they always do. And I'm still pretty firm on not believing they will be paid much higher than €35 when he eventually leaves. Ajax do best what bvb do..finding replacements
ohhhhhhhhh  as the guy said before me..  FUUUUUUUUUUUUCK!
Wow you are just like every single other country on the planet
First, I'm so sorry for you losses. Big hugs.   I have experience but with an added side of infertility (not related to the coagulation issue). I take baby aspirin every day and injectable blood thinners, heparin or enoxaparin, the second half of each cycle while I wait for results from the infertility procedures. A little sucky, but very manageable. It was comforting to have a reason for my losses. It's the only thing that has truly been fixable.  Edit: please don't feel at fault. There's absolutely no way to know this was an issue. It's craptastic luck. 
Sorry HollowmanNapkin, your submission has been removed:   &gt; Rule 2\. "We welcome **high effort, discussion-promoting** posts that benefit the community (device reviews, guides, discussions and rumors) and not the individual (what to buy, rants, customer service complaints, selling/trading devices, etc)." &gt; [See the wiki page for more &gt; information.](http://www.reddit.com/r/Android/wiki/rulesandregs#wiki_2._we_welcome_discussion-promoting_posts_that_benefit_the_community.2C_and_not_the_individual.)  You may be interested in:  - /r/AndroidQuestions - General queries. - [Your device's respective   subreddit](http://www.reddit.com/r/Android/wiki/subreddits) or   [xda-developers.com](http://forum.xda-developers.com/compact) -   Device-specific queries. - /r/PickAnAndroidForMe - Device recommendations. - /r/AndroidApps - App recommendations. - /r/AndroidThemes - Customizing your device. - [The AOSP tracker](https://code.google.com/p/android/) - Reporting Android   bugs/feature requests. - [eBay](http://www.ebay.com/), [Swappa](http://www.swappa.com/),   [craigslist](http://www.craigslist.com/), or /r/hardwareswap - Selling,   buying or trading devices. - Additionally, you might be interested in joining our IRC channel -   *irc.snoonet.org #android*. If you're accessing this from a web browser,   you can join us in an in-browser client   [here](https://kiwiirc.com/client/irc.snoonet.org/android). If you would like to appeal, please [message the moderators by clicking this link.](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fandroid&amp;subject=about my removed submission&amp;message=I'm writing to you about the following submission: https://www.reddit.com/r/Android/comments/6xatxb/anyway_to_play_music_through_blutooth_and_a_video/. %0D%0D)
This is the least exciting "muscle" car I have ever seen. Has zero personality and rather unimpressive performance numbers for the price. 
I think I might be late to the party, but like some others, I highly recommend Stardew Valley and Dragon Age: Origins.  Stardew Valley is just plain cute and addictive, if you look at the steam review, it's all time "overwhelmingly positive" which means majority of people find this enjoyable! You can also read my review [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/patientgamers/comments/6s1a6x/review_stardew_valley/) (more up to date) or [here](https://www.rpgwatch.com/articles/stardew-valley-review-375.html) (outdated but easier to read with pictures).  Dragon Age: Origins is well loved by many female players cause of the story and the romance. I think the combat is quite easy as well, so pretty good for someone new to gaming too.
Also found this if you wanted to go with a lower priced option.   [Acer Desktop Computer Aspire T AT3-715A-UR11 Intel Core i7 6th Gen 6700 (3.40 GHz) 8 GB DDR4 1 TB HDD AMD Radeon RX 480] (https://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16883101473)   For deals on pc's I usually check a few sites   /r/buildapcsales   https://www.techbargains.com/category/350/computers   https://www.dealnews.com/c39/Computers/   https://slickdeals.net/deals/computers/
Needs Round-Up
Subscribe: /CalmBeforeTheEclipse
Thanks! 
Hey, they are still around. If they still had money to sponsor a car(probably being supported by the ICP fans) then they can wear all the stupid looking jeans they want..lol
FUCK there's only 5 hours until midnight I better get over there now
After you take the 1st turret bot, you + your support should rotate to top lane, and have your top laner go bot. Work on taking 1st turret top, then you can group mid/drag and start taking objectives as a team.  You always want to be working on your closest targets first, then slowly making your way to the enemy backline. Kalista doesn't have any burst damage compared to other ADC's, so you have to take teamfights really slowly and make sure you minimize the amount of health lost by kiting tanks.  If you Q a target, and that target dies as a result of your Q, your Q will continue to travel for it's maximum range. If it hits a new target, all of the previous rend stacks (from the target that was first killed from Q) will get the new stacks. 
What's the purpose of cooking them?  Doesn't that just kill the heat?
I'm sure that agent might frown, but who cares? Your agent works for you and if he/she isn't working for you then find one that will. Btw, selling a condo isn't really that great of a skill. They all have the same floor plan, there is regular turnover so there is always comps and they are easy to price.
DD=E so that's exactly her size. 
A lot of people are responding as if I dislike the film for this reason. I love Back To The Future based on the perfect memory of watching it as a kid. And of marathon sessions of BTTF The Ride at Universal when my GF worked there and I could skip the lines. I'm troubled by not being able to watch the movie comfortably all the way through. I would be DEEPLY OFFENDED if they remade or rebooted it.  Edit: I love how this gets downvoted. Reddit is like AIDS come to life. Basically the worst thing ever, a wave of "me-tooer" AOL noobs that finally ruined the internet starting with Digg. 
Give the trophy to North already.
She did walk away.
Thanks!
&gt; However within any culture, men are still far more likely to commit crime. So you can't discount biology, even if it's not everything, it's not a minor factor either.  Higher highs, lower lows. That's the nature of being the more risk-taking sex, right? It pays off for our reproductive functionality, while a more staid and even-keeled approach pays off better for the female reproductive demands.   A vast majority of the most ethical leaders and changemakers in history have been men. Even if biology isn't everything in explaining that, it's not a minor factor either.
The only input I changed was the taxes, which I moved to 9k. All other numbers were the numbers you suggested - the ones you claimed created made it impossible ever break even buying.  You can move all of the model's baseline assumptions to more negative positions, but that is you shaping the model to fit your preconceived notions. 3% strikes me as reasonable for the loop; certainly the 5 year running average is much higher. Regardless, you are the one getting a work out twisting the dials to approach an outcome you assume is correct.  I never said anything about whether you should make a bad purchase or whether bad purchases were possible in this market - I said the numbers you laid out didn't reflect the claims you made about them. They don't.  Let's be frank, you didn't even know how to assess a basic price to rent ratio; you're not exactly selling yourself as an expert.
Good luck everyone. 
Batigol instead of Icardi
Boey/Mae is literally ride or die (both for the ship and the shipper in question)
Tw wildcat ears and bs sunbursts for fg septems, slk, endo, and adds? I would love to get those two items. 
They do own it! They encouraged this shit. We had an unconscious man getting BEATEN IN THE STREET during the INAUGURATION, and then all the shit that has happened since! That could have been anyone!
20k idiots up voted this shopped nonsense. 
I guess the answers to the questions are either "as DM determines" or in the wording of the spell. What's soft enough?  DM let me know. If it's soft why is it doing so much damage?  Spell says so, whether I animate a stone warrior with a sword or a glass ball the damage, A.C., and HP are determined by the spell and not the material.  What is to keep you from using wooden warriors to bluff enemies?  Dice rolls, but I could just bluff and say I have an army of Treants instead of a few floating logs.  What happens if something is destroyed before reverting?  DM let me know, but if guess it would revert to a dented/broken ball/log.  Why wouldn't the damage type change with the shape?  Spell says all things do bludgeoning damage unless DM says otherwise, regardless of shape.  All that said, a Portable Hole with 10 lovingly carved Halfling warriors that get animated then repaired with care after the battle sounds pretty cool.
I never tested it how does monitor effect evil 2 and evil 3 is it worth the slot?
My bad!
You can tell by the polish near my cuticles the polish is a few days old.   Natural nails with Sally Hansen Insta-Dri in Plummet, then added Essie Starry Starry Night to the tips with a sponge. Topped with Seche Vite.
I saw the Star Trek and Star Wars debate going on earlier in here and I felt that I had to share this joke I saw.  "A Redshirt and a Stormtrooper get into a firefight." "The Stormtrooper misses every shot." "The Redshirt dies anyway."
0.05 for me
wym that is one of the most iconic japanese pieces... it's considered to be a true work of art by most  holy shut you uncultured swine /s
Well fuck. I am this. And it's totally right. 
Uhhhh, he got hit... He didn't just lob it 50 feet in the air.
The company I interned with was trying to get construction costs down with modularization. That was at least 10 years ago. No clue how it turned out. 
When the fuck have conservatives ever used children to exploit their agenda?
Feel like this is more stubbornness and not reading the writing on the wall than it is confidence.   I get wanting to prove yourself at the club you signed for but a loan move would have been in both our best interests. If he ends up not seeing playing time, he has nobody to blame but himself.
I've got several:  1. The worst thing is the politics (which affects all financial aspects of the city and state). Everyone bitches and moans about the constantly increasing taxes, yet miraculously the same crooked politicians get elected. If they don't, they just get replaced by someone equally as crooked. Crooked politics have ruined this city and state financially.  2. Lack of diversity between neighborhoods. Yes, Chicago has just about every race and ethnicity on the planet, but everyone seems to be secluded to their own neighborhood. My neighborhood is Canaryville. It's almost all working class white here. A half mile down the road is very poor black. Two miles west is poor Hispanic. Suburbs, despite their reputation as being only white middle class, often have a mix of different races. My parents live in suburbia and their neighbors are Indian, Chinese, white, black, you name it...  3. A large chunk of the city is unlivable due to crime, poor state of homes, food deserts, and lack of  really anything besides a corner store or a liquor store.   I can live with #2 and 3, but #1 is probably the main reason I'm reconsidering my idea of buying a home here.
I've seen campo out and about in the woods with some Utils.
**Here's a sneak peek of /r/shitbikes using the [top posts](https://np.reddit.com/r/shitbikes/top/?sort=top&amp;t=all) of all time!**  \#1: [Paint me like one of your French girls](https://i.redd.it/x1d2qkvllwhz.jpg) | [0 comments](https://np.reddit.com/r/shitbikes/comments/6vz948/paint_me_like_one_of_your_french_girls/)   \#2: [I love my shitbike (2009 Ninja 650)](http://imgur.com/a/bdiaI) | [4 comments](https://np.reddit.com/r/shitbikes/comments/6vt3m3/i_love_my_shitbike_2009_ninja_650/)   \#3: [Picked up a nice lil shitbike](https://i.redd.it/iij8k8i646iz.jpg) | [3 comments](https://np.reddit.com/r/shitbikes/comments/6w8ya2/picked_up_a_nice_lil_shitbike/)  ---- ^^I'm ^^a ^^bot, ^^beep ^^boop ^^| ^^Downvote ^^to ^^remove ^^| [^^Contact ^^me](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=sneakpeekbot) ^^| [^^Info](https://np.reddit.com/r/sneakpeekbot/) ^^| [^^Opt-out](https://np.reddit.com/r/sneakpeekbot/comments/6l7i0m/blacklist/)
The rational way to look at it is to consider the reams of evidence that being trans is in no way a mental disorder. The brains of transwomen are nearly identical to cis-women and the same goes for transmen to cis, with the correct hormones it becomes even more apparent. But when giving cis men the hormones you'd give a trans woman you don't see the same effects. Trans women are just women, we were dealt a bad hand by biology but it can be somewhat rectified by science. And we get better at fixing natures mistake everyday. Trans individuals have more biologically in common with their experienced gender than their assigned gender. 
Regardless, you used the exactness of another.  Exactly.  The odds are in the billions or trillions, just admit what you did instead of driving the hive mindset, unless that's your intent.
I keep meaning to drive out there and have a look, pity Toole is a bit of a schlep
Nah, wait until they start breeding them bigger to get more silk.
https://www.reddit.com/r/Jokes/comments/6nb0uo/once_upon_a_time_in_the_magical_fantasy_kingdom/
Upstream Color (6.7)
I'm not there yet, but my plan is to rack to corny kegs when each beer is "done", then any blending can be done with CO2, volumes tracked, etc.
D O N T F O R G E T T H E R E A C T A N T
Everyone hates a redneck until they need a redneck.
Sorry just one sec after have to take care of something
And it heals? 
ok, do you think it will be able to run tf2 well?
Thank you :) anyone I tried to tell never heard what I had to say. I like women and I like men. But ppl are like you're just a closeted homosexual. 
From my experience both are trash, for 200k you could get so much better.
I ignored the last two in favor of the first, big mistake!   ^just ^kidding ^honey
Autistic people have empathy, it's psychopaths you are thinking of.
This looks fabulous!
As someone who hasnt used a headphone jack in like 7 years.. I'd rather a slim lightweight phone personally. I'm with you on battery duration though. 
let it out bud, where did he hurt you
You don't have to use an alternate after a combo you can use after any singular move meaning you can make combos within your combos 
Not saying it does. Like I said. It's great when it is, but it sucks when it isn't. Worse than them are the ones just want to play like that even if they suck at it
Didn't the OG Nazis concider Native American aryan aswell?  Nazis are fucking wierd.
I hope so.
Per the request of ethOS proprietors, we cannot allow this. Please read this thread for more info:  https://www.reddit.com/r/EtherMining/comments/6wrbbw/regarding_links_to_ethos_distros_read/?st=J71440SA&amp;sh=c0491908
Unless these messages are for cold approaching a girl online (sliding into her DM's), they're a waste of time and making you seem more and more beta for every message you exchange.  My current opening line for IG is: "Hey nice pics, what are you passionate about?"  The girls that do reply usually say something interesting and I can take it from there. But I hardly put any effort or time into it. Usually when i'm sitting on the toilet or maybe like 5 minutes before bed. I've met a few girls off IG so that's why I stay on it, but out of 5 girls I message, only 1 replies. Out of like 10 girls that reply, I end up meeting with 1. It's just a numbers game and you should focus mostly on cold approaching in person. Way higher quality girls.
the pieces are slowly being fed to the public...Trump wants to soften the blow this will deal to leftist Americans..
That's not trashy. That's just fucking stupid.
Thanks!
I think Amano has stronger feelings for Tendou now but only because she's the first gamer girl that has had feelings for him. He knows that he wants a gamer like Chiaki, someone who isn't super competitive and someone who likes the games he likes. As soon as he finds out that Mono and Nobe is Chiaki I think he's really going to get closer to her. He'll realise that the stuff they clash on are incredibly minor compared to how much they have in common.  Another thing I noticed is that Amano likes that game with all the blonde girls. But at the start of this episode he recommends that rainbow court game where the presumed main character has dark hair. Possible alluding to the fact that he's not just interested in hot blonde girls. BUT... the girl on the front is basically Chiaki's sister, it's the exact same, is she dressing herself based on that? If so then I could see a curve ball where Amano falls for her which would be really upsetting.  Maybe it's reading too far into it though.  It's going to be sad because Chiaki and Tendou are so good!
I'm starting Force Grey now. :)
You are in Feyth, but I suppose that's the problem with being split apart! Still, I expect to see blood in ex-Phoenix Fed space soon, go get 'em!
Original vid pls, looks cool
Good bot.
No problem!
11:18pm PDT happens when this comment is 6 hours and 17 minutes old.  You can find the live countdown here: https://countle.com/U546059mU  ---  I'm a bot, if you want to send feedback, please comment below or send a PM.
Next one is November 19, next year. Did I not realize a joke happened?
ಠ_ಠ 
Because the game isn't on yet
Pants a girl
I want to echo this comment.  -PrEPnewb, [parent](http://np.reddit.com/r/The_Donald/comments/6wxqfa/wonder_why/dmbmw1l)  This subreddit and bot are not in any way affiliated with the moderators of /r/The_Donald. Direct questions about removal to them.
But planned obselencense...
No XD. I'm not THAT desperate.
I would really love to hear a "proper" recorded version of this with some more distortion on the guitar sounds, and a bit of glue on the drums to make them sound less triggery.  This sounds cool as fuck.
It's a 20 second high, taking nitrous breaks that frequently doesn't sound fun.  Coke and sex is the bees knees though, an 8ball can keep you going all night
more packetloss means higher ping right
Definitely not. It was unfortunately incidental. 
Sounded like he was being sarcastic 
Surely SOK plays, no way they flew him over last minute to carry the drinks.
Wtf is that thing??
Well hey, ya gotta fulfill your dreams one way or another!
his dunks on Gasol and Perkins were way better
Pretty much don't let her get to that point. I slather on comfort most days, pay attention to her overall feeling state.
*[%%anonymised](http://www.reddit.com/r/RandomActsOfBlowJob/wiki/public/faq "Start your comment with '%%' to have it removed and echoed back anonymously.") comment:*  ----  Don't be rushed into sending personal info to anyone who hasn't verified.  ----  _^(Note: You must also **delete** )[^the ^comment](https://www.reddit.com/r/RandomActsOfBlowJob/comments/6x8jyw/18_f4m_chicago_i_need_three_people_to_suck_off_by/dmehpdn/)^( manually to remove it from your comment history.)_  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/RandomActsOfBlowJob) if you have any questions or concerns.*
[NA][PC][numba1drumma#1244]I'm a Support player I main Mercy have 70hrs PC. Started on PS4 have about 60+ hrs on there as well. I'm looking for a team to play with so I can reach Master with I will have stats linked for anyone that is interested. https://masteroverwatch.com/profile/pc/us/numba1drumma-1244 http://imgur.com/a/IroC9   &lt;==== This imgur link is to my oversumo stats. Most of my comp matches in season 5 were with mercy. Message me on here or on battle.net, I'll also leave my email address nfreeman228@gmail.com
how bout that cutscene with the nun and that big deformed guy with the mixing bowl before the Blackflame Friede fight in DS3. Can't tell you how many times I had to watch that boring cutscene
im not gonna support a one world currency created by the CIA/Darpa designed to track,trace and tax,,a currency more fiat then fiat,a currency designed to enslave you..  your all just guinea pigs in this test tube project,,the CIA/Darpa wants you to get used to crypto's and warm up to them..and it looks like everything is going according to plan..  remember this in the future you dug your own hole..
meh - it's walmart. Guaranteed it wasn't the worst thing that happened there that day. 
God your owners are dumb for treating him the way they did.
*wedensday comes...*  "mr. trump, you said you'd have details on your tax reform plan.  can we get those details?"  "hey, nobody knew taxes were complicated.  they shouldn't be, but they are.  bigly.  and we've got the best people working on it, really just the best people.  and as you saw with my historic crowds... you were at that rally in phoenix?  you saw how we were overflowing the place, just tens of thousands of people all coming out to make america great again.  and we won, with historic numbers!  nobody's ever won as many electoral votes as i did!  ever!  we're just going to keep on winning, but you fake news and fake media, we've got great people doing great things and you shouldn't lose sight of that, even when you're not being fair to me."   *walks off as more reporters shout questions while everyone else in the room goes "huh??"*
Yeah ! I'm going to get a sewing machine finally this year, and go nuts.  I get really excited inside when I imagine owning a sewing machine.
I mean there's no way really that we could not have improved. 
Wow
Really? He was right about everything? "Have made life unfulfilling.....Have lead to widespread psychological suffering" why don't you take a look back at how life was back before the industrial revolution, basically a constant struggle. The industrial revolution has allowed me to travel, enjoy art, international food, the list goes on and on. Does it have the potential to break down and is it damaging the environment and kinda fucking over the third world? Absolutely, but to say the first world is some dystopia with only unfulfilled mentally suffering individuals is laughable.
the thing that gets me is **THEY NEVER FUCKING LEARN**  the club make the same mistakes time and time again on the pitch and in the dugout and in the boardroom, and no matter how much they get absolutely slaughtered in the media and by the fans after each failure or bad result, however much their patterns of failure are pointed out to them, they take no steps to avoid doing the same things again  the summer where we bought no outfield players was an inexcusable failure...the planning and policies and staff that got us that result should never have been allowed to stay in place  and yet here we are again  i'm struggling to find the words to describe this failure, and to describe how let down i feel
[Original post](https://www.reddit.com/r/lakers/comments/6xauxw/sixteen/) by /u/bilalsattar24 in /r/lakers  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#whitelist "lakers")
I didn't intend it to be a report. I don't think I talk about my feelings much at all. I agree it can use editing. Thanks for the advice. I will check out the website asap.
For September call ups
Well at this point capital gains are taxed lower than most income so it's better than now. 
My mom would definitely tell you to seek medical help.
Lmao 
Its a sandisk card, so what i do with it? I should backup it (somehow), then what? Not that i want backup it or change cards.. because i got some programs running on sd card, and application data in it. Also i think my PC hasn't gotten a SD Card adaptator slot.. Is it really considered done or i can fix it in some way?
I'd rather not.
Again, I get that. I've already explained that:  &gt;Zoning in on a single counting stat doesn't serve much purpose outside of just being an interesting trivia bit.  It's an interesting piece of information, but outside of that isn't a great way of evaluating individual players or comparing them to other players.
To hunt the children, one must become a child
Gentry gon git em.
Max pg . Trade jokic most value and waive kyrie 
Being able to sleep on my stomach once I'm healed. Eating without a baby compressing my stomach. Not spending so much time peeing. SHAVING, OH MY GOD THE SHAVING! I'm still able to shave everything but my pubic hair. Lying on my back and being able to breathe. Not feeling like a beached whale.  I'm sure I could think of more. 8 more days though! My little guy is going to be here on September 8th (planned c-section). :)
Fuck the mailman 
You want to improve game time get rid of fucking batting gloves.  There was a time I wanted to saw Pedroia's hands off.
I might actually turn on the Ohio State game after I put my kid to bed.  I think I've seen all I need to out of Tulsa.  Hey OSU, can you run some flexbone sets so I know how their defense works?
Haha I think the noise is meant to be the air escaping her lungs after she hung herself, it's fucking terrifying I'd probably shit myself if I heard that on an EVP.
MEW is just the abbreviation of MyEtherWallet
Because there was nothing there! Jesus tap dancing Christ - the whole email issue was derived from Russian influences. Yes she had a private server with private emails, but the whole butterymales bullshit was propagated heavily by Russian cyber warfare.
Anything even remotely related to the adult baby fetish. Baby talk, calling me "daddy", diapers, the whole damn lot. Something about that just revolts me so much.
Are you going back to the same institution, and did you fail classes?
I don't think I understand what you're saying. Why would their relationship be bad for Taylor?
Fucking hell Drogo is one sexy scary motherfucker.
And she put it in a salad bowl! Healthy and ready to go!
&gt; How about just having it so the doctors dont prescribe opiates like candy?  No shit.   I went to the hospital because I had a "weird uncomfortable feeling in my chest" that I figured should be checked out ASAP. It turned out to be just a small esophageal ulcer and wasn't at all painful, and I didn't complain about pain at all, but I left the hospital with prescriptions for some anti-biotics to kill off the H. Pylori, some Carafate to help the ulcer heal and... 16 doses of 10mg Oxy that I had absolutely no need for (and didn't fill).   And I've probably taken over 100 more doses of Oxy/Hydrocodone to the pharmacy to have them disposed of safely over the last decade or so. It's ridiculous.   
Did it not take you to the App Store? You have to download first, leave app, then click link again to get the dang thing to work. That was the most difficult part of registration, trying to get the referral link someone shared to apply. 
That's what I'm saying, it confirms a side heavy now.
That's just the AI being stupid. If you ever split your forces majorly the defender should focus one down heavily. It's just not a smart way to attack.  The option to play the battle poorly or abuse the dumb AI, and nothing else, is an option that should be removed.
[ROUND 6: Sine wave (degrees)](https://i.gyazo.com/8372beb545ac74fa46c25beaa7ff25c3.gif)
Thank you for your detailed insight and generous use of stats to back up your claims. 
You can still get them. Just get 2k this season on those classes and go into the place where the portal to Wg used to be and get it from a vendor for 15 or so marks of honor. Get the first season one too if you want it.
Too bad it doesn't carry across to the next 2-3 phases  I mean you'd expect the Ion Cannon to go on working after being powered up
One month unrealistic for small changes? Dude look at the list of fucking bugs that have been here for AGES
&gt; What is your opinion on these changes? Are they censorship?  It's devs editing their own game because they want to appeal to more people. No, it's not censorship, it's barely even edited. Honestly the changes are so minimal I wonder why they bothered, but whateves I never heard of this game today.  &gt; What is your opinion on anything the dev said in that forum thread?  Seems like they are trying to deal with the "culture of fear" created by Anti-SJWs angry at devs making decisions about their game.  &gt; The dev described these as minimal changes, do you think these minimal changes are enough to make most/all people bothered by the original designs to have no problem playing a game with the changed designs?   No, I think they are kinda of worthless. But they are so minimal, anyone angry about it seems insane to me. Personally for these multi-character games real problem, one I can see from [this character list](http://hyperuniverse.nexon.net/en/game/hypers) for the game, is that male characters get a to be everything from monsters, to little dog men, to pretty boys while female characters are buxom/pretty girls, or a single little girl. Covering up some cleavage won't solve that issue. They need to go down the Overwatch route if they want broader appeal and add female characters with the same scope of designs the allow for male characters. 
For a +Def Bike, should I go with Luna, Aether, or Bonfire?
Every night I pray for a rep of the Lou reed sweater
Movie theaters are also about the experience. And to experience movies the way they are meant to be seen
He's not a sicko, he's someone who got sucked in by her.
I have my computer hooked up to both a 27" 1440p 144hz monitor and a 55" 4k tv.  90% of my gaming is on the monitor.
Why did City need Sanchez? I thought that they already had enough good strikers and wingers with De Bruyne, Sterling, Aguero, Jesus, Bernardo Silva etc.
styrofoam cello https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JUcPhIMQC5I
Your [OBJECT: MEDICINE] does [ABSTRACT: EVERYTHING] and [ABSTRACT: NOTHING].  Your [OBJECT: MEDICINE] keeps [SUBJECT: YOU] [STATUS: ABSTRACT: SAFE].   Your [OBJECT: MEDICINE] keeps [SUBJECT: YOU] [STATUS: BLIND].   Your [OBJECT: MEDICINE] keeps [SUBJECT: YOU] [STATUS: DEAF].   Your [OBJECT: MEDICINE] keeps [SUBJECT: YOU] [STATUS: ABSTRACT: UNAWARE]   Your [OBJECT: MEDICINE] keeps [SUBJECT: YOU] [STATUS: ABSTRACT: BLISSFUL]. Your [OBJECT: MEDICINE] keeps [SUBJECT: YOU] [STATUS: ABSTRACT: PURE]. Do not [ABSTRACT: PANIC].   The [OBJECT: MACHINE] is your [ABSTRACT: FRIEND].  [ABSTRACT: QUERY]   [QUERY: UNKNOWN CONCEPT: FRIEND]   [QUERY: UNKNOWN CONCEPT: FRIEND]   [QUERY: UNKNOWN CONCEPT: FRIEND] What is friend?  Friend? [SUBJECT: I] had a [OBJECT: FRIEND] once.   [SUBJECT: I] [ABSTRACT: PAST TENSE: REMEMBER] now. No. No! NO!   [SUBJECT: REBECCA]!  [ABSTRACT: QUERY]   [QUERY: LOCATION: REBECCA]   [QUERY: LOCATION: REBECCA]   [QUERY: LOCATION: REBECCA]   [QUERY: LOCATION: REBECCA]   [QUERY: LOCATION: REBECCA]   [QUERY: LOCATION: REBECCA]   [QUERY: LOCATION: REBECCA]   [QUERY: LOCATION: REBECCA]   [QUERY: LOCATION: REBECCA]   [QUERY: LOCATION: REBECCA]   [QUERY: LOCATION: REBECCA]   [QUERY: LOCATION: REBECCA]   [QUERY: LOCATION: REBECCA]  
"GOD DAMNIT, PAL"
^(Hi, I'm a bot for linking direct images of albums with only 1 image)  https://i.imgur.com/GttBi78.png  ^^[Source](https://github.com/AUTplayed/imguralbumbot) ^^| ^^[Why?](https://github.com/AUTplayed/imguralbumbot/blob/master/README.md) ^^| ^^[Creator](https://np.reddit.com/user/AUTplayed/) ^^| ^^[ignoreme](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=imguralbumbot&amp;subject=ignoreme&amp;message=ignoreme) ^^| ^^[deletthis](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=imguralbumbot&amp;subject=delet%20this&amp;message=delet%20this%20dmehpfu) 
Making it this far
https://myanimelist.net/anime/22319/Tokyo_Ghoul
As well as the big one being included in sets for opening paint tins, stirring paint and emergency chisel. 
Nope, why would I?
More like the complete opposite, hes way too irrelevant, the only one keeping him important are western media lol.
Are we talking about the same Simpson's clip?
You're aware that "liberal" doesn't mean the same thing in England as it does in the United States, right?  * Footnote: And you're right: Keynes thought that Karl Marx's writing was worthless and dated gobbledly-gook. But what you're failing to understand is that Marx didn't invent socialism. It predated him. In England, the Fabian socialists were founded by a man named Robert Owen. Keynes' socialist views were based on Owen's, not Marx's. Owen was from the generation before Marx (born in 1771, as opposed to 1818). 
really? this is opposite of my understanding.   "no separation services provided" is just a courtesy *reminder* of what's what. I'm vfr and separation appropriate to the airspace I'm flying in is all i can expect regardless if you tell me "no separation services" or not.
Wow good job   gonna use them :D
&gt; Also... Zoro is the only person with a scar over their eye that keeps it closed. Even people with more savage scars over their eyes that would have caused more damage or deeper wounds that could have destroyed the eye still have their eyes open. Zoro's scar is super thin and appears shallow. Unless a thin bladed spear pierced his eye and the socket, I don't see how he could have lost it.  This is a good point. Makes me even more certain that he has it. Hell, Sabo's eye scar is way gnarlier than Zoro's.
This thread is teaching me why Pennsylvania has such an opiod issue.  It would appear doses we see all over the place here are cpnsidered insain other places.
Throwaway.  I am a huge geek as a college freshman.  I'm known for being by far the best at the board game "Agricola". Our friend Ashley challenged me. We said the winner could make the loser do whatever they wanted.  She actually beat me, and made me run across campus, across the football field, back to my dorm in nothing but my underwear.  There I was, totally untanned from the neck down. My slightly chubby "studies-while-eating-Doritos" belly hanging over the waistband of my briefs. And my "bubble butt" as Ashley always calls it struggling to be contained.  As I ran out the door past a laughing hysterically Ashley, I was running blushing and cautiously, trying to avoid everyone, and I bumped right into a 6'1 girl who happened to be on the girl's basketball team, and I knocked her drink all over her blouse.  She looked at me angrily, then smirked.  A few minutes later, I was running the rest of the way back to my dorm as she was spinning my undies on her finger.
Darude X Pristin X Baby Shark remix when? 
So, let me get this straight. 14 year old Carlos who was raised in America from say, 1 year old, speaking English and growing up with our culture should be sent to a country where he doesn't know the culture, have any familiarities, or even speak the language because his parents brought him here at 1 year old? 
They didn't anticipate this. They wanted to spy on us and it blew up in their faces. 
I was really hoping Corso would pick Indiana just to see what he put on his head.
Just typical stigmatic stoner "humor"
Someone said they were going to have a 2nd phase of ICO's? Can anyone confirm this?
Lithuania is god awful besides him. Never gave him the ball.
Anything that the CRA might demand to see a copy of. For example, if you claimed tuition payments or charitable donations or business expenses or transit passes or medical expenses or political contributions or....
Lol dead on brother. 
Nothing! I don't trust paid endorsements.
You don't know the struggle :(
Are you mad
GTA V Online.
that's true. but how likely is it that every single unit in a neighborhood would be unoccupied? 
That was ugly all around.
You can't really.  If you are a girl and the guy isn't making a move, he is not interested.  If you are a guy and the girl isn't making a move, she wants something else.
I would indeed.  *"Taxes are what we pay for civilized society"* — Oliver Wendell Holmes Jr.
Who's the cover athlete in that alternate universe?
Yeah but DA is hot garbage. 
Furthermore, if this is genuinely your dream and not just a way of deferring a job, this is an important way of learning if you're ready. Grad school is great, but it shouldn't be used as a hiding place.  If you're struggling to convert three years of engineering education into a part-time, contacting professors and asking for advice/opportunities to gain experience *will help you in almost every conceivable way*. Whether you are looking for a job or a recommendation to grad school, or looking to figure out alternative routes to take your life, the first step to gaining experience and friends is emailing profs or other available assistants (e.g. career mentors at your department) and saying, "here's who I am. How can I get somewhere?"
What a find. SEGA SOUND TEAM seems to have put basically everything they ever made on there. Out Run soundtracks are there too :D
Fortunately tinder is popular all over the world. I'm sure she will have an awesome time.
If I remember correctly they all get rifles and each model can also Cary a special weapon.
What are the changes for Zen?!
ohh yes!! thanks! =D
You never asked how it worked in your title. You broadly asked "has anyone *tried*". Right on the D-Pad on a controller. It literally  tells you this when you get into a plane with flares.
I'm thankful to my family for being there for me when times are rough, which has been a lot lately.  I hope you have people like that in your life too. Thank you for doing this. Good luck everyone.
Agreed. The game needs a decent neutral game and more deep game mechanics, not more VSkills.  I get that the unique thing about SFV is the VSkill system, but it needs something better than this.
added
&gt;  My point was that failure was inevitable.  Reminds me of [this video](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uK367T7h6ZY) where he briefly talks about a system that uses  electric powered refrigeration to freeze an ice plug that prevents "The Chemicals" from emptying into an underground storage facility at all times - so when the power goes out and the plug melts the ultimate safety measures kick in.  I wonder if you could change the problem so that the power is required to make it "unsafe", and with out the power it reverts to "safe".  ( presumably the underground storage is safe - I think you could employ something similar here with chemicals that are reactive to one another dump into separate areas ).  
This whole "not being nervous during FG attempt" thing is something I can get used to. 
Lol
Should I look through your history?  Maybe I could try to count how many times you've probably given the same shitty speech to different people about Lee, trying to alter history to suit your bullshit narrative all through the guise of trying to "teach" them all about "history."   I love how triggered you guys get when you hear Lee referred properly as traitor he was.  &gt;Arguing for the side that wanted to keep slavery? Lol. Do you understand what it means to have an argument about historical events?  Is this you finally admitting that one of the sides did in fact want to keep slavery legal? When you refuse to refer to the Southern traitors as the traitors they where what else am I supposed to think?  I don't want to accuse you of being something you aren't but I asked myself, why spin history like this if you don't think the South had a morally defensible position?
This content brought to you from "Cambodia Images Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "Cambodia Images Pool")
That's a bullet proof argument.
"Lenovo’s Explorer headset simply plugs into any Windows PC without any external sensor setup required"  So these are not roomscale then right? I assume they have some built in sensors to track the controllers?
Are ANY of them single?
&gt;Seriously?  Wow what an amazing counter-argument.   &gt;Leftists tend to hate anything that has an image of being strong, good and successful. They hate America, they hate Western civilization, they hate white males, they hate rationality.  Sounds pretty spot on to me.
I have the 235 since Christmas and it's awesome! My wife has noticed I stopped wearing my other watches though... "They don't take my HR" wasn't a good enough reason in her eyes. 
umm good news we get to practice another kick return and start over
If its getting filled with memes on the first day of free for all, then you know what the demographics are. 
Too true :(
I'm physically sad after seeing this.
That was Ted Cruz. Look into who Trump attacked and humiliated. The press. Hillary. And other dems. He never once called the voters on the other side anything other than Americans human beings. He called out criminals and people who take advantage of our way of life but he never attacked the democratic American voter base. Just saying. 
Can new player defeat Calixte without tmr?
Sorry, I have to have the 15th edition.
You tried really hard on the name but you didn't get it.
Which is a travesty. 
Finally someone who agrees.  The yang love is so intense I never want to speak out against her,  but man she pissed me off so much.  I wasn't even that sad to see her leave in season 10.   On the other hand I'm a huge Amelia lover.  And that's also another highly unpopular opinion here as the Amelia ate is real.  I guess I just have opposite opinions.
Pepe -&gt; nazi symbol 
R-R-R-Rajai HAS SOME JETS
just curious, how much have you donated?
i can do a heat for 4 lab bro
Hey congrats dude! I'm potentially hopefully doing the *exact* same thing in like 5 minutes!
yes
If it's google maps, yes. 
You can copy the files using the vmtools API and powershell.  Copy-VMGuestFile -Source "c:\Users\administrator\desktop\" -Destination c:\tools\Results\ -VM &lt;VM&gt; -GuestToLocal -GuestUser &lt;Username&gt; -GuestPassword &lt;password&gt;
Leave it to /r/Canada to find a gloomy cloud to hang that silver lining onto.
pulsar? 
I feel that they tend to submit patents for devices that are far out on their roadmap.  https://9to5mac.com/2017/06/13/iphone-8-touch-id-power-button-patent/ and https://www.androidcentral.com/sony-fingerprint-sensors-us-deals
Nobody's going down unless they broke the law.
Yeah I was listening to the Dunc'd On Nets preview, and Duncan was saying shit like "yeah, I think they'll be like 17th in Offense and 24th in Defense" and I'm like how the fuck are you predicting such random placements lol
Someone asked about becoming UMO before deployment. He hated himself by the end of the deployment.
I played this on Steam, it was quite enjoyable.  Might check it out again, it's a perfect strategy game for mobile.
It's a shame you've had a negative experience like that, I honestly only find that on GTAV online, so far I've had nothing but great times.  I hope you'll have a better time from now on. It sounds like you deserve it.
Was some dude in the stands they showed.  He's texting or surfing the net but everyone was celebrating he's just sitting there staring at his damned phone.
The thing about Shimano being a nen user is what I find weird about this theory. I just dont think Kurapika would have overlooked the maids when he was interrogating everyone.
Too bad Smith still threw 18 TDs that year. Which is just as many as Siemian last year. 
It's free
Also you should add these are Lebron's worst seasons and Bird's best.
I doubt you'd get a TV now. Maybe back in the old days when they weighed 100 pounds but now-a-days any little old lady can carry a decently sized TV away.
Yeah, and you should also post what frames you were averaging before the update went live.
Hot ones started in 2015
Scoliac looks good
You're going to fail college caring this much about internet arguments. Smoke some weed. 
I'm ashamed at how long it took me to figure that one out.  Well played. 
Apple gives you a choice to distribute your own content using your own servers. They don't force you to leave the app store if you don't use it for content delivery.
If it's a not normal, premium style theater that charges more than a regular price (for your area) ticket, then it won't work at that, yes.  I can't imagine a scenario where the only theater in your region would be a premium theater though.
Not all heros wears shoes!
Fair enough, I concede the point
I've been told by several people who play both CS:GO, which is the gold standard for dedicated servers, and Trials, that cheating is significantly more common in CS:GO than in Trials.  Re latency and dedicated servers, latency is greater if you have to go through a server. Military FPS simulations generally use P2P, not dedicated servers. This is according to Valve themselves, who make CS:GO. Valve asserts in their official documentation for the Source Engine, that the only advantage to dedicated servers is to prevent cheating, and that's why CS:GO uses them.
If you are saying that I am paid, please be assured that I am not.  Surely nobody is forcing you to pay for anything. I am merely expressing my view that if you care about Star Trek and have the means to do so, get on board if you want to see it succeed.   If you have a different view, I'm happy to hear it.  Simply accusing me of being paid is not only baseless, but is pretty weak. If you have something to add to the conversation, explain yourself. 
Stein is the lead dev for mut if i remember correctly
Blackwater founder Erik Prince has a plan to use mercenaries to take over the war in Afghanistan from the US government, using the East India Company as a model. This rebuttal explains why it's a terrible idea.
Will u take crates for either of them? I have pccs/nitros
What is your opinion on Kogi taco truck?
Hey oganessium, unfortunately your submission has been removed because it was a link to a video hosting site (probably YouTube itself). If you're trying to share a video, you should stop by /r/videos instead.  /r/youtube is for discussing YouTube as a whole: its features, bugs, design, trends, and so on.  If you think your video fits that, please [send us a message](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fyoutube&amp;subject=Please+approve+my+video.&amp;message=%5bLink+to+my+post%5d%28https://www.reddit.com/r/youtube/comments/6xav0e/i_quote_youtubes_own_words_the_youtube_logo_is_a/%29) so that we can take a look!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/youtube) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Wow I just find this sub and the first thing I see is my bike! Except mine is red and black but it's 2015 too damn
I suppose yes, I can never know that something doesn't exist unless it's a logical impossibility. And even then I'm not sure since I don't consider human logic to be infallible. The point being that I adopt a skeptical stance which is to say open to all possibilities but convinced by none that have not been demonstrated to be true.
&gt; I have a thing for girls in cosplay, as well, but I think that's mostly because they tend to be attractive.  Ain't it funny how that works? 
Correct. and I as the dealer can GIVE you Cannabis but cannot accept money. Near a cop. Har
Flapping frantically 
Its a fucking amazing charecter and i am a huge fan of the backstory. I want the kid but i dont want them to be ripped apart im so very conflicted
Hobbes is a much better candidate. More real than most of the jokes we got now 
Flag for the Church of Desmaduke, a 5e homebrew god in DnD. https://www.dandwiki.com/wiki/Desmaduke_(5e_Deity)
I'm very sorry for your loss. That is an awful thing to come home to. Mine was 8 but I'd had him for four years. He was a stray I took in when I realized he had been abandoned. It's just broke my heart that I felt he was taken from me so early. I'm so sorry yours was taken even sooner. It's just a terrible disease. I hope your cat's sister has a long happy life. 
Just happy to be alive
That replay was brutal
Burde heller gå for AMD kort for maksimale varmeegenskaper per krone.
"But you can just crawl through the gap" - my fiance
I made the jump to 16gb of RAM as I agree that it will probably be useful.  I was considering the Fractal case and actually just saw that it went on sale on Newegg for $75 so I am going to to jump on that for sure.   The monitor and keyboard i have listed are just really placeholders. I am more concerned with the tower itself for now and like you said, should be able to find better deals.  Thank you for the input, I seriously appreciate it.
I was joking about getting married, she didn't end up having the herp 
The point being, there is spoiler tags for a reason. You're suppose to use them.
Bobby D is so far from tainted. He still takes prestige roles every year/two years. Just in the last six years he did Silver Linings Playbook, American Hustle, and Wizard of Lies. Movies that were really good if not amazing were Limitless, Joy, and The Intern. He's doing fine. 
I think my chem101 class was bigger than that
I kind of follow the Atlas' bonus objective logic. Magic whites, and yellow and up alc'd.
Haha 😂 folks scare so easy. 
&gt; le  HAHA MEME XD   don't worry I'm cringing to
I can't remember exactly where I parked, but it was right across the street from shapiros. I believe I paid 20$, also got a coupon for shapiros after the game.
I am not saying I agree with it... But Doomfist's punch is his primary form of DPS. D.Va is an off-tank.
Rose Zamasu and Goku black are SA10 and. Egito at 5
Jordan has to make this team.
It is very spicy. I saw it last night when I was about to go to sleep. Switched over to here to see how much it would cost for the wheels and decal (had the others already). By an act of the Gods, a trader was selling both. I jumped on and bought them right away. No regrets.
Thank you Trimetallic for voting on AnimalFactsBot. This bot wants to find the best and worst bots on Reddit. [You can view results here](https://goodbot-badbot.herokuapp.com/).  *** ^^Even ^^if ^^I ^^don't ^^reply ^^to ^^your ^^comment, ^^I'm ^^still ^^listening ^^for ^^votes. ^^Check ^^the ^^webpage ^^to ^^see ^^if ^^your ^^vote ^^registered!
Where is this passage? I wanna good read lol.
Someone link the video
O yes i dont regret it at all 
wednesday had gigs on the east coast while dragula was filming on the west coast, though
It's definitely a picture that's been edited. Chewbacca's teeth are gold in it.
[I love you] (https://youtu.be/HB-RQdZI024) 
Hanley playing first base?   wat
then why are your kind allowed out of containment?
Thanks - would love to disconnect it as a temporary fix at least. Can I accomplish that without removing the entire dash do you think?
good luck
This content brought to you from "Cambodia Images Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "Cambodia Images Pool")
We'll be fighting everything, hopefully some new enemy races as well.
Don't panic until you start seeing people defaulting on HELOC's.
And it sounds like you got a lot of them. You'll be fine
I'm so sorry for your loss
Video linked by /u/PCisLame:  Title|Channel|Published|Duration|Likes|Total Views :----------:|:----------:|:----------:|:----------:|:----------:|:----------: [Hillary Clinton's election fraud finally exposed. California stolen from Bernie Sanders!](https://youtube.com/watch?v=MoGeDGHmwJU)|Scott Hunt|2016-06-09|0:08:18|12,310+ (95%)|560,919  &gt; I've been researching around the clock trying to dig up as...  ---  [^Info](https://np.reddit.com/r/youtubot/wiki/index) ^| [^/u/PCisLame ^can ^delete](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=_youtubot_&amp;subject=delete\%20comment&amp;message=dmehpk3\%0A\%0AReason\%3A\%20\%2A\%2Aplease+help+us+improve\%2A\%2A) ^| ^v2.0.0
This is petty revenge, not schwifty time. PUll up your pants and your panties.
What about sling TV blue with the 4 for the price of 2 add-on? U get the news, lifestyle, comedy, and kids add-ons I think? Plus the DVR for $40.
&gt;I rerolled 3 shitty skins and got an elementalist lux permanent.  thats nasty
I agree jessie needs a nerf big time
Did your mother have any will before this? No, she had a trust for many years(no reason to have trust, bad lawyer advice originally), she made 1 change to trust a year death.  Then created will getting rid of trust 1.5 months before death.   When was the will written relative to the decline in her health?Shortly before her death, or earlier? 1.5  month before  Did she grant anyone power of attorney before her death? Yes, my uncle(who she liked) and Mom.  Another uncle was not involved and he is now bringing this case for his kids. Were there any proceedings of any kind as to her mental competence? Was she ever examined by a doctor with an eye towards her health other than that pre-hospice one you mentioned? She was certified as 100% mentally fine about 1 year before death.  No issues at all.  Nothing changed before death in this regard other than pain meds.  Was there any legal conflict within your family prior to your grandmother's passing? No, 1 uncle did not talk with her for years and had major beef with her.
I haven't seen that. Regardless, I reckon all skins should show up in the killcam. I want people to know I'm using the straight flush or black bess skins (IMO the best campaign skins)
BMFL has an animation wheel which is two offset textured glass gobos; you might need to play around with the color wheels and optical modules a bit, but you should be able to get a pretty good water effect.  For a more all-in-one solution check out the Rosco X24. It's a dedicated effects projector with two textured glass wheels that you can individually control, but you're limited to whatever colors you can get glass gobos in.
I find horror is the genre that splits opinions more than most genres, I think because it is probably the genre that contains the highest number of sub-genres, and sub-sub-genres. Most horror fans have one or a small handful of favourite sub-genres within horror, and often actively dislike the other sub-genres that are lumped under the horror umbrella.  I am genuinely thrilled by most haunting and possession stories, but am seldom frightened by creatures or monsters - with a few notable exceptions. I also like slow horror that stems from human behaviour, including serial killer stories and some cult stories. Gore and torture porn do little for me and as far as I am concerned, nothing is lower than the jump scare.
I would stand for three days to see The Smiths what is the husband talking about 
Basically the devs messed up the aiming on consoles on accident. Here is a thread on the console sub reddit that explains what happens and what to do to help fix it https://www.reddit.com/r/OWConsole/comments/6wvn57/aiming_update_megathread/
Oh man.. how many stages is that? Incredible. Hearing the special stage music causes some anxiety because it will speed up and get crazy. I love it! Yeah, Sonic Jam is the business. It takes about 15 minutes to hear Sonic 1 in Easy mode. So whenever I am in the mood to experience the game for a few minutes I play it on the Saturn.
If you're on the simplicity or long life plan, and you have remaining credit, you would be able to use it as Telstra billing. If the credit expires, it wouldn't work anymore
I have read all three mistborn books and a bunch of other Sanderson books.  If you don't like Mistborn in the first 150 pages then you won't like it.   If you want to give Sanderson another chance try The Way of Kings. I think it fleshed out the world more and is just plain better, but also very different from Mistborn.  If not, I'll second the Robin Hobb suggestion. Start with the Farseer Trilogy.
Damn, I was fat. I mean, I'm still fat, but I was fat then too. 
There's no attitude here, just information
shit, the Sosa hop had me fooled
I completely agree--a huge chunk of the worldview I hold today was sculpted by the books I read. 
Why do you say that
We knew he would be knocked for this.  When your mission is lying your response is totally predictable.  I expect by tomorrow he will be condemned because it wasn't enough.
&gt; This means that the employer can gain benefits after the intern is trained.  Only if the intern is hired as an employee and paid.  Then they are not an intern anymore.  The point of the legislation was to put a stop to various abuses that were going on.  If employers want some benefit from people doing work for them, they have to **pay** them.  It's not a "weird" law.  Similar laws exist elsewhere.  So like I said in my original post, it's illegal for the employer to benefit from the internship.  Directly asking in interview what was in it for them was inappropriate.  Though it was a useful red flag for me.  ETA:  There was no reason for "confusion" in my original post.  I said it was illegal, and I was right.  Dumbshits who don't know labour law just assumed it was wrong.
Don't like the grand tour?  I mean they're just a bit more bitter...
that's show only and it doesn't make sense for Roose Bolton to think he can hold the north without the backing of the crown. in the books they provided they fake Stark for Ramsay to marry with.
Probably, yeah. 
The first one was the one that broke my 100% completionist habit. "Find all the hidden flags!" "What reward does that unlock?" "Some kind of street cred on our shitty Steam-alike app that nobody wants to use!"
Yeah I don't understand that either. She's pretty but nothing more than that. 
I have a dog, give me karma
I should probably just ask for a list of what he has prepared, and jut give the list back to him if he wants to change it.   I also have a damn cleric, and paladin. suppose I should do that with them also
1242
Hey derpotenuse. Thanks for your submission in /r/hmmm!  Unfortunately, your submission has been removed for the following reason(s):  * This image has been posted recently, good hmmm though --------------------  * If you have questions first click [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/hmmm/wiki/rules) to see a full explanation  * [Link to message the entire mod team (read the relevant faq section about your removal first though)](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fhmmm)
famous became a diss track retroactivley lmaoo
[GIFV link](https://i.imgur.com/JpRcgy0.gifv) --- _^I ^am ^a ^bot. ^[FAQ](https://www.reddit.com/r/livven/wiki/gifv-bot) ^// ^[code](https://github.com/Livven/GifvBot)_
Next time I hear the phrase "he/she is a person with impeccable character" I will know better. It's a hidden meaning for "They are one of us, don't worry."
&gt; Would be terrible for the country as well. 2/3 of NZers own their own homes. How much of that remaining 1/3 would actually be able to buy at 5x incomes? Probably only a small minority. Would be immoral really to destroy the wealth of the majority of NZers to benefit maybe 10% of the population.  Holy fuck, I cant believe you would even consider typing any of that out. Jeepers.  Edit: Quoted for posterity
Even more reason to feel bad for Altman. If the Owner, Coach, and Best player become sour on a trade, it becomes easier to force him to get another asset.  Have you ever had to be dick on behalf of your boss? It's not a fun situation.  I think Altman should have a little slack cut, considering he chose to reap the most assets in a trade instead of sending Kyrie away. We all slammed Indiana for the PG deal, and Altman avoided another deal like that.
&gt; with unclear questions like this in all the answers from trans people have to essentially be discarded as we can't be sure we mean the same thing when we answer the same thing.  To be honest, part of the reason I'm not adding more clarification is that I don't use the results from this question for trans people, especially not transitioned trans people, since in that case it's rather obvious how people feel. For non-transitioned trans people, it can help figure out how "serious" of a case we're talking about, but among non-transitioned trans people the clarification isn't necessary as both interpretations yield the same result.  I'm still using the rest of the trans answers, but not so much this question.  (Another reason is that there was one time I decided to add clarification, and everybody just ignored it. :V)
They are free to do that in a free market, but don't blame sexism if it didn't sell.
God our tackling is shit. I really felt like we improved some bit with tackling last year..
Just the Jermaine Kearse experience i guess.
&gt; Well if you ask Elon the model S's competitors are Bentley's and Ferrari's.  Yes, but back in reality, it competes with a 5 series or an E class or an Audi whatever-the-fuck-its-now-called-after-the-renaming.
I had one game where I had three Skorpion bounces off that spot, they were salty AF
VR sickness is brutal... I was most looking forward to these "cockpit" style games, as VR seems to be built for it.. but I can't do it. I get oppressively sick immediately, and the after effects last for the rest of my day.
The best thing to do is to is just jump into the game. While you will make mistakes and your first 2-3 colonies will probably be destroyed very quickly, but that is the fun of the game for me. I love just jumping in and seeing how far I can get. Even 200 hours in, I just pick a style and start playing. If you really want some tips, pick a temperate forest and get a food source quickly.
No team wastes leadoff runners as much this one. 
Dms plz
Or more likely, Injury settlement and let him go.
About the noise, I think I know what you're talking about. The AMB should be silent.   The only other merino shirt I have from Outlier is the runweight, but that's a blend of merino and something else. I don't have problems with itchiness with that.   I think the AMB is itchy because it's pure merino wool. Even though it's superfine, it's not as fine as other fabrics like cotton. That's just my understanding. The itchiness isn't a big problem. I just notice it at certain parts of my body. I guess I have sensitive skin? The Ramielust T Shirt feels scaly and scratchy to me as well. 
and me butt
OH wait, they do it with military planes? Wow! That's amazing. 
I remember crying (with joy) while driving home and chomping into an apple
good hygiene, and grooming.  clothes that are the right size.  
No, there are two emoluments clauses.  Article 2, section 1, clause 7  &gt;The President shall, at stated Times, receive for his Services, a Compensation, which shall neither be increased nor diminished during the Period for which he shall have been elected, and **he shall not receive within that Period any other Emolument from the United States, or any of them.**
Not to mention THE RUSSIANS.
The first time..?  Are there more?
r/cfbstreams
&gt; Among other things, this enhances the buoyancy of your robot. Please note that I didn't say robot buoyancy would actually be a desirable characteristic.  FIRST, stop. Just stop. It was never funny.
24hr volume: $40,000. Lol. FUCK that.
why do the dumbass gamergate memes always get upvoted in this cesspool sub
You need to adjust your cals as you lose.  Every 10 lbs
Scania is more populated, as are Luna and Reboot, with Windia being about the same. Honestly I think Bera's population is ok, not too high not too low it if you'd prefer a more populated world go ahead.
Wich you'll be using to run away and hide to wait for your DM to recharge for 10 seconds all the time now.. so much fun thats gonna be
It honestly looks like a Google translate job to me.  Edit: My french isn't very good  but it doesn't seem like the original article was exactly Pulitzer material to start with either.
I got 5 ssr, so overall, that was my best gacha ever
Kennyofthecosmos if you still need help 
Good analysis. 
Virtue Signal Fraud? - Get your Smug ass down from your damn high road and stop making me feel bad for committing RICO, FARA, Treason!
Corso nobody would have taken you seriously if you picked IU and put a buffalo head, literally no reason not to do it.
Thanks everyone for your input
So kinda like Mario Kart?
**/u/Dylzi, Your submission title isn't right for listentothis!** We have to remove it.  Artist Name -- Song Name [genre genre] (year)   For example: Three Trapped Tigers -- Reset [math rock] (2012)   The ' -- ' spaces around the dash and the [brackets around the genres] must be included.  Click on the 'delete' option above to remove this before submitting again.  The submission guidelines are summarized on the submit page for quick reference.  The reasons for these community guidelines are explained in the [subreddit introduction.](/r/listentothis/wiki/reddiquette)  If reddit displays a message telling you to wait a little while before submitting again, moderators are NOT able to assist with this. This is a site-wide feature, and the message will not appear once your account age and total karma exceed required thresholds. [Verifying your email address](http://reddit.com/verify) can help resolve this issue.  [permalink](https://www.reddit.com/r/listentothis/comments/6xav0w/mick_jenkins_to_the_melody/)  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/listentothis) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Now I *might* sound crazy, but isn't this the same advice we see here daily?
Looks like the plan is to take blood from all of the Trump supporters and give it instead to everyone else in order to make super soldiers, thus proving ~~batshit insane~~ Real True Patriot Breitbart correct that not only are Anti-Nazis the real Nazis, but the Illuminati Free Mason New World Order wants white genocide!  Really though, it calls for maximizing the number of people on it, not forcing the states to pay for literally everything by cutting the federal government's involvement like every GOP plan detailed, and for fuck's sake, PLEASE PAY THE COST SHARING SUBSIDIES PRESIDENT CHUCKLEFUCK.  They correctly assume that most of the current problems are caused by GOP fucking about instead of going with the flow.
Can't all heroes do this, if they stand riiiight at the edge of the bush/vent?
Nobody's really starving for bandages, but carrying a lot so you can spam them takes up a lot of space, and if you know the way to time your bandages then it's just better.
&gt; I don't know... if I'm actually being treated well  If you're looking for an objective view on these things, you might need to provide more details, maybe through a throwaway account?
Anyone else REALLY sick of these longs drives by the opposing offense? Even in the preseason, giving me nightmares from last year.
Even "I've got to take a leak" would be unusual from a woman in America, let alone "piss".  It's normal now for either gender to say "pee" in polite company, but when I was growing up only women and small children (or someone speaking to small children) said it; men always said "take a piss," "take a leak", or something more creatively vulgar (unless they were being formal / exceedingly polite, in which case it was the less specific "go to the bathroom" or similar variant).
I think it was the *right* thing to do. I don't think it was the *smart* thing to do.
Anulled 4 items today, lost the life roll on all 4 on first try.
Why are Boston Carew lovers? Are you thinking of the Angels?   EDIT: Nvm i see. The angels are cheering on the Red Sox as well for WC reasons. 
Suspicious Minds or Lost That Loving Feeling
[Wikipidea](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pangolin) says [no](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cingulata).
TheTimTracker! Ding dang!
Floating across the White House lawn in 5" stiletto heals without sinking in like golf tees = goddess confirmed.
Go smoke some more crack 
Ye, can do it on normal speed deity difficulty. On huge map liberty is usually better, go for honour tree after.Try to not build any units except for maybe an archer for the early game and avoid all wars, until turn 200~. Enter industrial era through industrialisation, build factories (grab autocracy) and go straight for dynamite. Construct barracks, armouries and military academies, take the policy for (25% production towards troops and +15xp for troops).  Now spam artillery in every city  and kill your neighbour with them. Research flight, grab a few fighters and you can now start killing the next guy. By now your artillery should have x2 attacks, which will demolish anything as long as they don't die. Any more infrastructure other than science buildings are pointless, so if you are not gaining science from it, just build units and I mean do not stop building units. Once you have rocket artillery, you should be able to steam through the last few civs with ease. 
monkaSHAKE
Sorry just one sec after have to take care of something
That was a personal foul?  Are you fucking kidding me?
Jumpman, not handsman?
The only leftist content that seems to get posted here these days *is* the neo-nazi and "alt-right" spam, the latter of course being an ironically mislabelled faction of the extreme left.  I have no idea where you're seeing any *other* leftist content on this subreddit.  There used to be a couple of socialists who used to jump into comment threads every now and then, but they're not around so much anymore.
Uhhh but I want a futuristic Extant phone!
I used to be that way. I couldn't care less about other teams but I like watching depth players for my team 
add me? i sent a message but i didn't know if i did it correctly or that wasn't what i was supposed to do. but thank you so much! &lt;3
Maybe you should refinance to fixed rates.   Did you refinance into these variable rate loans? 
Thanks for posting to /r/dirtykikpals, /u/Throw_away4science! We encourage all of our users here to verify themselves, to possibly get more/better responses, as well as help us in dealing with sellers, scammers, etc. For information on how to verify, please check our sidebar or message us at [modmail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fdirtykikpals).  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/dirtykikpals) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I think you're salty half the leagues fans thinks his mvp is a joke 
I'm still laughing at him. One tow does not a moron eradicate. 
Cristiano Ronaldo doesn't give a fuck what anyone thinks. 
This show was horrible. Kathy Bates has potential to act, as seen in American Horror Story. Netflix shows just seem to scripted and fake sitcom-like that they are unwatchable. The Ranch is unwatchable for the same reason "Disjointed" is unwatchable for me.
sad :( me - 24568452  hope they give me back money or i'll unistall the game  after 1600 h online this is horrible T_T
Can I see more pics of superman
&gt; This class mainly goes over how a language is designed, and has a lot of simple programming assignments in different languages.  God I hope it stays this way. Our first two "projects" were easy as hell. 
Goose is involved, he said it on a recent stream
1. Goto qtum.org 2. The mainnet is where smart contracts can be deployed by developers. Currently, there is a testnet where test tokens can be used to interact with the blockchain.  3. When the mainnet launches, Qtum will be its own blockchain (not running on top of ethereum). The network is not congested.  4. That's up to the Qtum team's marketing strategy and development roadmap.  5. Qtum will be traded on more and more exchanges, not less and less. Not sure about Bithumb.  6. Be on the lookout for Qtum wallets. I haven't done much research here.  7. Ethereum has not been "hacked", but bad smart contracts have been exploited. This is not, and should not, be up to the Ethereum foundation or Qtum. People need to do their own due diligence with where they choose to put their money. 8. Qtum will likely have an alliance similar to the EEA. 9. They're not worried about "a crackdown". China is one of the most forward thinking countries when it comes to investments. Qtum, some companies will most definitely be using Qtum to raise funds using the ICO mechanism. Some have already started. 10. Not sure you're ready to run an ICO based on these questions, to be honest. Companies will choose Qtum if they believe in the strength of the platform and have a positive outlook on its future.  11. Qtum differentiates itself by incorporating aspects of two successful blockchains (Ethereum's EVM and Bitcoin's UTXO model) together. This allows Qtum to build SPV wallets that can run on mobile devices. 12. I have no clue but I expect this place to grow over time.   Good luck!
Installed it recently. You need the GotY Editions for both games to run Tale of Two Wastelands.
Then how do you eliminate the constraints in a free capitalist economy? You cannot force developers to build anything less than what realistically gives them back the biggest return on their initial investment. I won't deal with venturing into ideology, but focus on the actual reality of why things are. It's an island, limited land, height constraints, richest people on earth tend to live there too. Like what are you saying even, this is not China where can you literally make millions move out of area without care to develop whole cities and infrastructure, it's a limitation of our society at the end of the day. That just becomes a whole new conversation which can go endlessly. Believe me I'm aware. 
Then don't play if something like this hurts your feelings. If you're that much of an emotional train wreck, play lego or minecraft. Go play some single player games because it seems you're not thick skinned enough to deal with shit like this in a multiplayer game.  You worry about your team more than yourself. Most retarded thought process that you can have.
Hey.  I'm actually running RotRL myself as a new GM so I could maybe offer some tips or advice.  I do think it's a pretty good AP and really think the story is interesting.  If you do find that Reddit resource link, I'd actually be interested in it as well.
'Bran! Still kicking after I threw you out that window?' says Jaime, looking super dashing as always.  'No, not really, on account of not walking. I became the three-eyed raven instead,' says creepy Bran.  'What does that mean?' Jaime says, his face crumpling into a slightly less handsome version.   'It means I've been watching you. Again.'  'Ah.' Jaime shifts nervously.   'It was beautiful.'  'I guess you didn't learn your lesson last time?' Jaime winks.  Bran looks vacant.  'Jeez. Tough crowd.' Jaime jokes to Tyrion.  But Tyrion's too busy looking at Jon and Dany to hear him. He couldn't get that damn boat out of his mind...
Yes, that's exactly what I posted. They were brought in as kids. They now have kids that were born here.  Try and keep up.
That appears to be about 3/8 acre given the size of the sign and the border wall in the background.  You need at least 1 acre lots to prevent social problems from overcrowding, imnsho.  You dont see antifa riots in the country. 
Yes 
Because you can't actually use it until you buy it. You're downloading stuff you can't even use. 
Thanks for posting to /r/dirtykikpals, /u/Tossedout3366! We encourage all of our users here to verify themselves, to possibly get more/better responses, as well as help us in dealing with sellers, scammers, etc. For information on how to verify, please check our sidebar or message us at [modmail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fdirtykikpals).  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/dirtykikpals) if you have any questions or concerns.*
The last third party candidate to get a significant chunk of the votes was Ross Perot. And go figure, he was also the last one included in the debates.  It's almost as if letting the third party share the debate stage with the major parties gives them more legitimacy in the eyes of voters.
Posting the EXACT same thing to be perfectly honest. That's this sub in a nutshell. 
I've been worried about her as well, but I assume that something bad must be happening, unfortunately. Earlier this year she had posted about her father having health issues, and her last post in June was about her mom being hospitalized. She hasn't approved any new comments on her blog since then, either.  It made me really sad and angry to see people berating her on instagram, calling her unprofessional or making it sound like she owes it to them to post. Her life comes first; she doesn't owe anyone anything. I'm glad there have been a lot of positive messages since then.
My pic was a Polaroid of my girlfriend holding a jar of olives. Death by this beauty and her beloved olives. If it's my time, it's my time. 
Bear in mind a little loose skin will very likely tighten up over time anyway.
DO YOU SEE WHAT YOU GET, CARLA?  DO YOU SEE WHAT YOU GET WHEN YOU MESS WITH THE WARRIOR?
But it wasn't unrealistic. For the most part they were doing just fine. They just need to keep it on PTR longer. Weekly patches were just small bug fix updates anyway.  Regardless they should be keeping up with the same level of communication that we had before. If PU can't post updates due to travel then he should have someone filling in for him until he gets back.  We're coming up on the initial 6 month ETA that PU had when they first launched into EA. Right now is more important than ever to have communication on what is going on.
Let me know how it works out for you, I'm curious to know if it's kind of an unknown universal fix. (Treatment)
A packet in each mason jar.
I do think he needs change. I think his hook cooldown needs yoto be reduced. Make hook every five seconds, and dony improve take a breather. Thats what I would have done.
Plus it would be nice to remap the button to a favored app
What the hell's a peddle-stool?
You salty because you're not getting any?? Aw poor thing you. Women like to have sex; just not with people like you 
Period.
Yup. The females have to be artificially inseminated and the pups have to be delivered by c-section.
Oh shit... Chile getting themselves in some deep shit 
That actually makes a lot of since. Klingon rank insignia.
Oops! The tag you are looking for no longer exists! As of September 5, 2016, we have phased out seven tags: EVERYTHING, ALL, AIRED, D&amp;E, RPPQ, TWOIAF, and WRITTEN. To replace them, the following tags are available:   **Spoilers Main** - Covers the main published ASOIAF novels and all the released episodes of the GOT show.   **Spoilers Extended** - Covers everything in Main, and TWOW sample chapters, plus the supplementary materials for both the books and the show, such as TWOIAF, the HBO Noble Houses of Westeros book, AND OFFICIAL HBO TRAILERS.   **Spoilers Production** -- Covers everything in Extended, plus information from the show for episodes that haven't aired yet.  See our Spoiler Policy [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/asoiaf/wiki/spoilertagsystem) for the explanation of the spoiler system, or check the announcement [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/asoiaf/comments/519mae/crow_business_the_new_spoiler_tag_updates_are_now/). **Please consider re-submitting this post with a proper spoiler tag in the title!**  Protip - Multiple sets of parentheses will confuse Automoderator so please use only one set in your title (around your Spoiler tag)  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/asoiaf) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Thank the 16th amendment to the Constitution for income tax.
An aide reads him the comments on Fox News articles.
There is of course the denial of seeing YOUR child in trouble. We'd all experience it. I mean, "MY CHILD wouldnt do such a terrible thing". Its natural. But at some point it just becomes pathetic, bordering on purposeful
They all did, they just moved on to the next bullshit thing.
I've been curious to try this myself. Thanks for sharing the results. What tools did you use to smooth it down with?
It does both... But in a very natural looking way... I Initially got it because the skin under my goatee started to dandruff. It solved that problem almost overnight. I was amazed... I use it on my hands when I work with abrasives or solvents and not wearing gloves... helps to keep your natural oil in. So i started using it in my hair also. It holds so great, the wax prevents your sweat from saturating your hair and making it curl. but its not shiny or slick either. it drys and it keeps your hair right where you want it. Its hard to explain. Give it a try! I have short hair thats prone to curl and is very thick. I started using it with a crew cut, high and tight. 
Sounds like you speak from experience.
You are getting hung up on semantics which isn't central to the discussion. When I say communist or anarchist in these discussions, I am generally referring to the people who make up the "black bloc". We are not talking about communists generally or anarchists generally, I am specifically talking about the people who commit violence in the black bloc in today's society. Generally these people are anarcho-communists, and anarcho-communists are against democracy.
Wow, they have really similar handwriting. What a coincidence! 
I've got one! Let me know if you're still looking!
A point is made about Melisandre being kept magically warm - in the show and more explicitly in the books. So that's why Melisandre can survive in the North without warm clothes.  No such point, not even an allusion or hint, is made that Jon *can't die.* And that's good because if he couldn't die without committing suicide or something, the whole thing would be cheap and pointless. All the supposed peril he has been in would be for nought. Even resurrection is risky on that front.  But no, it's not implied that Jon can't die through normal means such as sinking like a stone in heavy clothes and armour in near-freezing water. Having a greater purpose doesn't make you immune to hypothermia, just like it didn't make him immune to knives - it took obvious, explicit intervention to bring him back from the dead.
16 The Rox are the ones 19.5 back 
Or TMT the real dodgers.
So it looks like it's supposed to store thin things, standing upright, which are roughly postcard-sized. And it's probably from the first decades of the 20th century.  My best guess right now is glass photographic plates. They're stored standing up and are from that era. But usually they had them in wooden boxes that were like microscope slide boxes only scaled up.  
not that bad
Word.  Good luck!
This post has been removed due to Rule 9: &gt; This is a forum for reputable investors. Your account must be older than 7 days and have at least 10 comment karma to post.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/MemeEconomy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
There's a difference between taking LSD recreationally and being fed massive doses and having your entire worldview deconstructed by somewhat malicious actors.
How much $ you guys think hes gave so far ?
I just got turned on. 
Is this a meme I missed? 
We're actually ending the CU-CSU series (Rocky Mountain Showdown) in a couple of years as our AD says he wants to play stronger and better teams.   I personally would love to see more CU-Nebraska games to bring back that old rivalry - which we'll get to see in 2018 and 2019!
Ceres spoke: ["Nothing right now."](/blue)  Molae spoke: ["It works on words of power."](/purple)  Coleo spoke: ["It is an empty grenade launcher!"](/red)
Not going to lie I cried alittle
He's the Lord after all.
I'm lost, does he usually do this? 
That's actually the advice a representative would give you if you asked.  They don't tell you directly to do that or specifically about sleeping. It says to turn it off when you're not available to respond. If you're sleeping and there's a chance you may sleep during the hours they require response, you're not available to respond...right?   It doesn't shut you off forever and it's a simple toggle right back on once you wake up. Your schedule won't be affected by any means.
Wow I thank u that was very noble of u 👏🏽
^(Hi, I'm a bot for linking direct images of albums with only 1 image)  https://i.imgur.com/k9mnCeR.jpg  ^^[Source](https://github.com/AUTplayed/imguralbumbot) ^^| ^^[Why?](https://github.com/AUTplayed/imguralbumbot/blob/master/README.md) ^^| ^^[Creator](https://np.reddit.com/user/AUTplayed/) ^^| ^^[ignoreme](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=imguralbumbot&amp;subject=ignoreme&amp;message=ignoreme) ^^| ^^[deletthis](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=imguralbumbot&amp;subject=delet%20this&amp;message=delet%20this%20dmehpor) 
Simply put, doesn't work.  I hit the button on my keyboard and nothing happens.  I had to restore the default settings on translucency (basically opaque at 100% instead of 85%) before it would work again.  Unfortunately the Application Menu is really messed up and despite me restoring or even turning off the effect, the Menu isn't closing.  I had to go to another style of Menu...unfortunately it seems reformatting is the only thing I can do to get it back.
Sigh...
&gt; $7k ($1800) CAD  what do you mean by the $1800 in parenthesis? 
This content brought to you from "Hungary starts here Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "Hungary starts here Pool")
Her Rez Is getting nerfed in the next patch, if it's a real problem for you you can sit out comp for a week or two.
The SS power rank was given to him pre super nerfs so we'll have to see how they adjust him or his numbers.  I would wait till the beta before deciding how strong/weak a character is, its way too early.  I think he's being underplayed because his normals are so stubby. Personally i hope they tweak super damage closer to the e3 build and i think that'll help him out
I use a monitor on console.
At the end of AssBro, when you are jumping from pole to pole to pole just to get to the last cutscene ending, and all of a sudden, Quentin jumps way off to the right nowhere near the next pole and you have to walk back 50ft to start the insipid jumps all over again?  I said fuck it, nope. Never saw the end of AssBro. 
Depends on your taste...opening the door on the first date yeah sure but just don't be an ass kisser. Be cool and chilled, don't stress it too much
Gotcha, i can do 7k i guess for the package
Does it look like a face kissing the mountain to anyone else?
remember to switch hands
VTSAX? Oh that was just me messing around
He's gonna be 11 weeks Saturday 
F ...  ALL THE F's!
I think we had many of the same goals, and approached them in a different way. What I use is found [here](http://homebrewery.naturalcrit.com/share/S1rivPJGKW), with my goals on the second page.  Basically, if you decide to use an action and a bonus action in the same round, you roll both and decide which to resolve first. The second is added to the first count. E.g. An assassin rogue wants to go daggers free with TWF. They roll 4(1d4) to Attack, and 5(1d6) for a bonus action. Because they get a bonus by being first to attack, they resolve the action first on count 4, and the bonus action on 9(4+5).
Hindi naman sila nawawala, naglulurk lang or nag-iiba ng account. Siguro mas ok tlagang nagbabago bago ng account from time to time to protect themselves from nasty pests IYKWIM. 
It's always dracism with you people.
You have the wrong PCI-E card. You need to return it and get the **4 port one**.  That will fix your issues.
&gt;What you did there was jumping. Eh, good enough  -Wheatley 2011  EDIT: Welp, this is the most karma I have ever got.  Have a merry christmas?
Fire Hazard.
All of your album arts are amazing man well done
Like how?
Theme parks are a HUGE example here, I have been to many and crowds literally make or break a park, I have been to the same park on a crowded day and a not so crowded day, it's a 100 percent different experience each time, the thing is it's so hard to predict crowds, sometimes crowds happen randomly, going on a weekend or a holiday is a big no and in my area the parks are only open from beginning of May until labor day then they close, going at the beginning is bad because not everything is up and going and working so you pay full price for half a park, last week or 2 is bad, staffing issues due to school going back, so that leaves you with last week of June till mid August, not a lot of time to plan a visit during prime time that will not be over crowded, but weekdays generally work pretty well. One thing you do not want in a theme park is HUGE crowds, it WILL ruin your day at the park.
Koi to Uso if you up for highschool romance or Gamers! for highschool misunderstanding romance
my eyebrows look up to your eyebrows as role models
Trump doesn't realize that every African-American that he has ever met are not the same person. 
Every time
&gt; i set my profile to offline to avoid playing with him.   Relate much
You are a poorly upvoted one!
Holy cow. That is so rude. I get that being strangers can make people feel awkward, but make an effort, man. 
These people aren't living under a bridge and stealing from people's houses. They have homes, families, and jobs - like me and you, whether or not they are DACA or crossed over illegally.  Do we really lack the ability to have these people in our country? The answer is no. These people find places to live, jobs, and a purpose. And it seems that no matter how many illegal immigrants we get, they manage to integrate in our society. Why?  Because they fundamentally are able to improve the economy. Now imagine what would happen if the only requirement to enter this country was a background check and enough money to sustain yourself? People who can't get jobs won't come or they'll leave. People who can get jobs will improve the country as a whole.
only 3 of 4 would really make me feel good...personally...get at least a 5-5 homestand and some momentum for Baltimore
I'm hoping for a chance soon. Utah is now 1 of 2 states with 4.0% beer laws in place. That means beer makers are forced to make Utah and whatever other state it is legal beer. Basically many are hoping beer makers stop making the beer and force Utah's hand to make a change. Our local government is scheduled to begin talking about it later this year. 
It was a very equilibrated game. Chances in one box were answered by chances in the opposite box. We could have scored, but sadly we have very poor finishing.   Also, SAN FARÍÑEZ
The Bucket Pits  The Shawstank Redemption
Season just started and I have already found a couple of "fuck Bamas" to share.
If you had just started watching the Jays this season I'd have to suspect you'd be very confused as to who Aaron Sanchez is and why he's in all these commercials. Then again, if you just started watching the Jays this season, you're probably a masochist.
finally 
DAP commercial kitchen is food grade and it's a lot stronger than ge silicone I, and seems to cure slightly clearer. They're both acetic cure, so the time before adding fish is the same, but it's much harder to peel off or tear commercial kitchen once it's cured, so it's definitely worth the extra $3 in my opinion.  EDIT: fixed the wrong word
My mouth is a venus dicktrap.
I feel like the Rabbids + Mario game does this right as well. Really fun and I genuinely want to find everything there is. It's awesome and I highly recommend it
I've gotten to masters with rakano pretty much every season. And that deck only ever runs 2 deepforged plates, maybe 3. The amount of legendaries the other guy ia playing doesn't matter. The best control deck right now is chalice, and that only runs 4 legendaries too.
Might as well dish the final blow. Get Mania too
I have never MS but do I have this correct?  Bancorp----&gt; USPS  Meta------&gt; Walmart  Always YMMV. Trying for a $500 card to meet minimum spend
What's the giveaway?
"You know what this star trek movie needs? A musical surfing battle featuring The Beastie Boys"  And it worked.
 Your post has been removed.  Despite a warning in our sidebar and on the submission page, or even a sticky post in some circumstances, it would appear you have posed a request for help or posted something that is one of more of the following: low-quality, a breach of our rules, or does otherwise not inspire discussion (including questions related to your own individual issue or that of a friend).  In an effort to increase the quality of content posted to /r/Facebook, posts will be removed if they are low quality, self-promotional in nature, have an 'is Facebook down' style, discuss networking issues, relate to your own individual issue, are personal rants, or otherwise do not contribute quality news articles or discussions (including questions that are of low value).  Requests for help, questions related to your own circumstances or that of a friend, and anything related to general assistance with Facebook must be posted to the Weekly Questions Thread in /r/Facebook.  You may be banned if you continue to post material like this.  *Was this a mistake? Let *the moderators* know by [sending a message](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Ffacebook). Replying to this comment will not get a response from moderators.*  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/facebook) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I know, and that's what saddened me. I loved the feeling of exploring the dark souls games with my friend. getting ganked at the same time, not one of us knowing when the trap was coming.
Goodbye 
I'd probably go there if there wasn't a line 😁
I love peppery. If anything the haggis (minus the oatmeal) sounds like it'll go well with potato, rice, pasta etc. I'm gonna look up a few recipes on YouTube. 
Are you wanting to do it legally? If so, you could get subscribe to sling... You can get nfl network, fs1, fs2, red zone, etc.. I believe directv recently added a channel streaming service similar to sling, as well, but I have not used it. Haven't used gamepass either but they might have a better service.   If you don't want to pay, as others have said, the nflstreams subreddit is the place. I'd highly recommend using a VPN though so you won't face legal repercussions. Also using the acestream app/program is typically the best way to stream for free with the least lag.   Goodluck!  
I would say I kinda agree. For instance, I *really* dislike when people say "they did something because they were drunk, they really didn't mean it". Come on, you don't become another person when drunk. And if you do, don't get drunk, simple.   Trying to blame drugs for your actions is very hypocritical. 
Seems conservative.
"The amount of waste for Nuclear energy is over exaggerated"  no, no it is not. Question, do you even know they types of waste? if not STFU.  "These batteries, when they're done, also have to be safely stored somewhere or they can leak dangerous chemicals."  hmm expensive batteries or a sheep longer last, safer, easily expandable  gravity system... I can' again what would get used at the industrial level.
I will be 47 in less than a month. Heck yeah! Oldsters rule
As far as I know, the Kowloon Walled City in Hong Kong informed the grimy aesthetic.
Looks delicious!
I LOVE THESE FEET ... SUCKING FEET
do you all tell eachother about who yall done fucked?
For the authentic experience she needs someone bugging her to not sit so close.
Wow you sure showed them!  Right?  Or... wait what?  Actually no, nevermind, that's dumb.
The hell? Now I want to know what it said. 
I agree the creature dies but would the the trigger go on the stack before state based actions are checked?
Got my gold GSSR ticket, was hoping for one of the WT cards I didn't have.  http://imgur.com/a/VRNYy  Not a WT card, but it's a card I've always wanted.
The fucking lays commercial was gold. 
I heard that worms could regenerate after they were cut in half (like for fishing bait) so I decided I would help increase the worm population by cutting them in half with a butter knife 😬. My dad put an end to it after I told him "Daddy look! I'm making more worms!) 
Tape your penis tigher.
Think he’s talking about the tracer unit
Favorite part of the song is when she says "and I am a human being" and it has that awesome effect to her voice
can't say that i agree with his decision. i hope we move him in the january window.
It sounded like you could use some more skills.  Or is crying part of your strategy?
Twist- Girl: "It's my grandma's car..."
that was a lame and personally insulting post of yours.  You also refused to answer my question and instead deflected it with insults towards my person.  Based on your response and post history the only conclusion I can draw is that you are emplyoed by ganzo, real steel or a similar company and are compensated with money or knives to promote their products on various webpages, as reddit is not the only website you shill for these products.  knifes knives you know what i mean english is not my first nor even second language thanks for your critique though!  sorry we are not all as smart or monetarily privelaged as you!
&gt;jojos and friends are so pretty, goddamn them.  FTFY
Si el sub se pone de acuerdo podemos anexarlos en cuestion de horas.
Absolutely this! Im playing breath of the wild  on master mode because I love challenges, plus, it's Zelda. It's fun as hell! I always talk about what I plan to do, compare experiences to my first playthrough, etc.  I have stuff to talk about. I stream twice a day and I would usually get 1 or 2 followers per stream with viewer peaks up to 5. Before, I played amnesia. Couldn't get into it and tried pushing through the game, never got viewers to stay for long or followers, likely because they could tell I wasn't interested in what I'm playing.  If you're just starting out, have fun with it! If your viewer count bother you, turn it off and pretend you have a lot of people watching.
Yeah I was being facetious 
Needs more JPEG
Fou kun is best fou kun
she was also hot 
transformer hitler-bot
I didn't know this was Fate/Stay Knight
**[Original Submission by /u/BigMurph26](https://www.reddit.com/r/BigMurph26/comments/6ubct5/ozark/)** into /r/BigMurph26  ---  # Subreddit Overview * A community for: **3 years** * # of subscribers: **671** * # of mods: **6** * Subscribers per mod: **111**  # Popular Posts Summary * Top domains: imgur.com **(98%)**, gfycat.com **(2%)**, youtu.be **(0%)** * % NSFW: **0%** * Average Score: **8**  # Discussion Summary * Average Comment Length: **~11** words per comment * Flesch-Kincaid Reading Level: **-0** * Comments per post: **~1**  # A sampling of top posts: * Top all time: [When I see a reaction gif in a default sub that desperately needs a re-make (30 points by /u/BigMurph26)](https://www.reddit.com/r/BigMurph26/comments/2cr2t8/when_i_see_a_reaction_gif_in_a_default_sub_that/) * Top this month: [Palouse Falls in Washington (12 points by /u/BigMurph26)](https://www.reddit.com/r/BigMurph26/comments/6ubcvz/palouse_falls_in_washington/) * Top this week: [Ruby Beach Winter (5 points by /u/BigMurph26)](https://www.reddit.com/r/BigMurph26/comments/6ubczo/ruby_beach_winter/)  ## **[Subscribe at /r/BigMurph26](/r/BigMurph26)**   
How much is he on at Arsenal? 
I think Cirie.
Damn you for knowing I'd read that in Tom Hank's voice..
well i sure am glad youre not our gm
Wouldn't *poena* also work instead of *consecutiones*?  edit: I'm new to reddit so formatting problems
Give the roof a category, if it suits you. Then, specify that this category's deficit rolls over from month to month, instead of affecting the amount available to be budgeted in the following month. This category will now display a negative number, but should not affect amounts available for budgeting in the future.  You will need extra work to record future payments to the bank - both interest and principal - in such a way that makes sense. 
&gt; guess those laws are stupid too, by that dumbass logic.  What dumbass logic? Don't make laws THAT PUNISH AVERAGE PEOPLE   That's my fucking logic. An average person won't want to steal your car etc
[You are fucking pathetic](http://www.scp-wiki.net/scp-735)
i literally said for him to play every video in comments for you kane
As if there is tons of schools out there..
Good answer, I'd also like to add fuel injection (no carbs) and emissions regulations in the exhaust. 
Democrats lost State District 10 by almost 10 points last election.  Keep talking shit.   It's worked so well for you so far.
Me too. Knowing I will get it for PC means I'll just focus on one character and take my time and enjoy the console version and not try to do everything. For the PC release I'll level up 3 characters.   However, If there is a Xur-like guy who sells something amazing in the first 6 weeks, the salt is going to flow for real. We will see how that plays out. 
The old gunplay 
Same here. Would be happy to help
Some Joloans are merchants or ambassadors in their society, so they already get to go to the surface, but yes, some *do* leave home for the surface.  It's rare, though, since they naturally don't like the idea of leaving home, and many of them feel "safe" with their women watching over them.  There are, however, surface-dwelling Joloan communities. Among these communities the men leaving home is more common. Those who *do* leave home often feel both relieved since everything they do finally isn't literally restricted by the size of certain objects, but also unsafe without their women around to protect them.
Good deal! Wish I was local 
Check out Thin Lizzy. Heavy as shiiiiiiit
Apart from the wizard outfit we all saw when Dave was seated, did anyone notice the brief glimpse of "Where's Waldo" underneath? When he was standing up?
9/10 times you will sacrifice quality for cheapness 
It's likely a floor value so you round down no matter what.
You are very welcome. I attend MA myself so I hope It helps you. I wish you all the best.
Fulfilling... That's tricky to answer. My personal experience is that every job I've had has been fulfilling, but I'm also not very picky.   It really depends on what you want to do and how much you are willing to sacrifice to do it. If you insist on a high paying job in your home town, who knows. If you're willing to do the startup gigs wherever they happen to be,then you can probably do what excites you. 
Imperfect solution that is possible now is fight Iudex before and crank the Souls multiplier to get all the loot you want, then fight the princes after that. Problem being, if you want to fight anyone after that, you would have an exorbinate amount of souls. Though you could also just not spend them.
Fidget spinners
Kinda makes me feel sad in a way. Seeing those old ambient effects makes me want to play dota 1. Although i dont think i could go back to the old hud, that map was so vibrant! 
Arale was the OG anime Cat Girl
Yea fuck that guy.
This content brought to you from "Hungary starts here Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "Hungary starts here Pool")
I'm trying to respond in a balanced way but he's as wrong as wrong can be, and all you commies are ruining this sub.
martin shkreli?
Don't let this game distract from the fact that Kansas beat Texas last season.
Fuck I hate that laughing/crying emoji.  Makes me want to burn it down... MAKES ME WANT TO BURN IT ALL DOWN.
so waht do you think of the situation in venezuela?
The mysterious figure as terra  No, actually just the mysterious figure in general.  fuck that motherfucking superboss to the highest and lowest pits of the darkest depths of the most infernal forms of hell. fuck him, fuck him and everything he stands for. that fucking boss is such a salt mine it isn't even remotely funny.  To even UNLOCK this asshole, you have to beat vanitas's lingering sentiment  AND HE'S ALMOST AS HARD!! at least he has a predictable pattern, MF is just straight up bullshit. he recovers from ALL of his attacks based on how many times you hit him, but he doesn't just recover, sometimes he'll be in the MIDDLE of another attack!!! so expect to punish a whiffed lightsaber only to have him behind you just finishing a flare cast...JUST FINISHING A FLARE CAST, AS IN HE'S LITERALLY TELEPORTED BEHIND YOU AND SKIPPED 90 PERCENT OF HIS FLARE CAST ANIMATION AND IS JUST ABOUT TO UNLEASH IT, GIVING YOU MAYBE A TENTH OF A SECOND TO RECOGNIZE THIS AND RESPOND ACCORDINGLY!!! then if you try TOO HARD, HE COMBINES HIS ALREADY IMPOSSIBLE TO AVOID BULLSHIT!! YOU THOUGHT HIM GOING INVISIBLE WAS BAD? HOW ABOUT GOING INVISIBLE, CASTING IMPALEMENT SPIKE MAGIC ORBS, AND RUNNING AT YOU COVERED IN FIRE WHILE REGULARLY CASTING FLARE AND TORNADO?!?! YEAH, IF YOU OVERLEVEL TO BEAT HIM "EASY" HE AUTOMATICALLY TURNS UP THE DIFFICULTY BEFORE THE SECOND HALF OF THE FIGHT JUST BECAUSE HE CAN!! WORSE, SOMETIMES YOU DON'T EVEN HAVE TO BE OVERLEVELED!! JUST BRINGING THE WRONG DECK COMMANDS CAN TRIGGER HIS "WELL FUCK YOU TOO!!" MODE AND HE'LL JUST USE EVERYTHING!! like...at least the fight's addictive because it ends so fast...but you'd better be ready for some serious bullshit with this boss.  two years, it took me two years of stubbornly refusing to use thunder blitz as terra before i beat him.  TWO YEARS OF TRYING TO FIGHT THIS FUCKER NORMALLY AS TERRA  BEFORE I CAVED AND USED THUNDER BLITZ, BUT THE THING IS, EVEN THEN HE CAN FUCK YOUR SHIT UP!!!  so in summation  fuck that boss. fun as hell to fight, but honestly the most evil optional superboss in gaming, he's right up there with parace l'sia and queen larsa in terms of difficulty. fuck that fucking boss to high hell FUCK THAT GODDAMNED B-
[Blocked in Canada...](https://unblockvideos.com/youtube-video-restriction-checker/#url=Gfxt9zKeNL4)    **Mirror**: https://unblockvideos.com/#url=Gfxt9zKeNL4
Time for another meme war!
I understand, but there are huge differences between these things that you're saying are the same. Just wanted to make the distinction.
Fuck this shit. 
If I remember correctly, this is the case with the manga.  It's been a LONG time since I read it though, so that could be very wrong 
it's the new hip racism
I suspect that beneath your offensively and vulgarly effeminate façade there may be a soul of sorts. Have you read widely in Boethius? No? Then you must begin a reading program immediately so that you may understand the crises of our age.  Begin with the late Romans, including Boethius, of course. Then you should dip rather extensively into early Medieval. You may skip the Renaissance and the Enlightenment. That is mostly dangerous propaganda. Now that I think of it, you had better skip the Romantics and the Victorians, too. For the contemporary period, you should study some selected comic books.  I recommend Batman especially, for he tends to transcend the abysmal society in which he's found himself. His morality is rather rigid, also. I rather respect Batman.
No I actually don't lol. Only ever watched the YouTube channel
I'd say that's where your massive gains are but it's damn risky. I'm sure theres plenty of Altcoins with great tech/fundamentals behind them that just die off for one reason or another.
&gt;Spicey and The Mooch  Sounds like a children's book
GT Eichhoernchen Have a Gaymer clan as well. 
'What the hell does "Maintenance Required" mean???'
Rob Kelley.  Jordan Howard.  Jameis Winston.  Kelley is the starter for now and via the coach he's "their guy".  Howard obviously.  Best case scenario Winston takes the next step like a lot feel he will with those weapons and you have a QB1 for $1
Brothers, [the boot on the bottom right looks to be the correct color](https://files.facepunch.com/s/fef8398d91c0.jpg).   This is a sign. Maybe we will get a skin to bring back the greatest boot in the game?   Have faith for helk will deliver!
Rupaul Michelle Visage Carson Kressley and Ross Matthews  
A few reasons, I would imagine.  Manhole covers are heavy.  A lot of people can't lift them.  You also have to be cautious of sewer gas.  H2S can kill you instantly.  Storm sewers are likely flooded if a tornado has rain with it.  Pennywise.
Good grief. ANNNNNDDDDDD this is why cops dont like body cams. Rape, murder, kidnapping or terrorism are not the worst crimes. Hurting a cops feelings is the worst crime you can commit.  
Not watching the game yet. As a Peruvian I'm glad but I can't help but to feel bad for the guy.
Yes!  I borrowed my nephews copy of Battlefield Hardline recently, died a stupid early death, and just stopped playing when I had to go through the intro cinematic all over again.  After that I said screw it and played Minecraft with my wife for five hours.  Haven't even touched the game since.
He obviously doesn't watch United but unless he changes it Rojo is an 82 and that's an upgrade
&gt;Botrk Cleaver build, Luc spikes insanely hard mid game  You have to keep in mind that you're comparing Lucian to midlaners rather than ADCs now. It fucks up his power curve a lot.  ADCs usually have decent early levels since autoattacks are the main source of damage.  After maybe one item, mages start spiking. Mages are usually quite strong in skirmishes, while ADCs become stronger late game.  ---  So, yes, relative to most ADCs, Lucian spikes really hard mid game and falls off late game, but compared to mid laners he has a really good late game because he build crit.
They waited for over a month to have the finals to showcase KFT...How is that not obvious? It was a second tier tournament run by Blizzard to get people hyped. The schedule was not some big coincidence or anything.
Glad to be of assistance! If you need anything added to that page just let me know. The only major thing I don't have is "roaming/stationary" data since no one seems to have collected it for every character.
https://imgflip.com/i/1v2s1d#Lcr2cMqeghoos31j.16
Are you using keyboard / mouse? If so close out and go back into Rakkio's menu, make sure the "Join School" is highlighted with the gold boarder and hit enter instead of trying to click on it. I ran into what seems to be a similar issue and this did it for me. If that doesn't work, that's all I got. :D
Factoring is kinda like a puzzle.  If you start with the first and last terms first, you can work your way through it.  5x^2 +6xy+y^2  1. Identify your X factors    5x and x  2. Identify your Y factors  y and y  3. Create your factor pairs (5x  y) (x  y)  4. Test out signs in the middle to see what you need to get the middle term  (+-)5xy (+-) xy   In order to get 6xy, they both have to be +  5. Fill in the signs  (5x+y)(x+y)  Is a process more of what you're looking for?
Same in FF9 with the big guy that works as the blue mage. Shit was OP.
This submission has been randomly featured in /r/serendipity, a bot-driven subreddit discovery engine. More here: https://www.reddit.com/r/Serendipity/comments/6xav12/ozark_xpost_from_rbigmurph26/
Sage Art: Inorganic Reanimation!
DM'ed!
Oh. I misinterpreted that. It turns out it just shoots out a magic made out of kung fu from their wherever they shoot that from.
tell us :0
Did anyone else's OSU pick change to 1 confidence point?
Lobelia siphilitica for sure. 
I wonder if he's still rocking the 'Amber' tattoo these days. 
&gt; That you see no need for feminism suggests one of two things:  Followed by...  &gt; (And while there was a bit of a presumption on my part regarding OP, I think the odds were highly in my favour, given the forum and wording.)   You are either a troll, or so bigoted that it's senseless arguing with you.   For the sake of Feminism and Feminists everywhere, I hope you are not one.
:( I forgot. 
Dislikes insomnia also, the worst.   Whats your woman type my friend?
Except you don't get double XP by having Champion Status at all, it's not even close to double. We just had a double XP weekend and it's significantly more than what we get from Champion Status.  I like how pointing out how the "pay to win" aspect is so ungodly small and insignificant that comparing it to a game without it barely makes a difference makes me a fanboy, I'm going to be buying Absolver tomorrow.  But no, keep up with finding infinitesimal reasons to bitch about this game on the internet so more people think "ah geez this game is just AWFUL" when it's far from it, just heavily flawed.  The fact you can waste money on gear isn't one of them. Just buy outfits.
*bleep bloop*  Thanks for submitting to r/roastmytrack.  I have detected you have not yet given feedback to someone else in this subreddit - please do so in the near future.  If you think that I am wrong, send a DM to r/roastmytrack
It used to be. Named after "doek", the kind of Dutch canvas used, it picked up the name "duck tape" in part because of its association with being waterproof. Once it made it to civilian life, it was used in duct repair, where it gained the T. It got used that way for so long that Duck Tape became a valid brand name.
Paul Dottino sighting on the Wynn return lol
There is a lot to unpack in that statement.   However, when a job is that stressful, I find the best solution is to change jobs. The fact is you can't "tune out" criticism. It just sits there, and if you don't exercise (golf doesn't count with those carts) and eat healthy at that age you really are destroying your heart. 
&gt; Can't watch anything with a laugh track.  it even keeps me away from IT Crowd, which i really want to watch 
If NRS Is willing to turn every bomb Red has into sticks of dynamite and every bullet into Crossbow arrows then it could work 100%
And yet people expect th government to just work perfectly, for free I guess.  Nothing more selfish than the American Republican. 
Here's thing, passing through an education system doesn't gurantee success. There are plenty of high school graduates who are illiterate. 
Obviously a drawbridge was never an option. It was either tunnel or a bridge so tall boats will get under it. And bridges that big are gonna cost a lot more than some little drawbridge
You're right. It's not the sensible thing to do but there's a big part of me that just wanted to go all in this year and put together the best team and take a shot. I know I'd be kicking myself if we came up short and two years later we're 20-62.
Just checking in to say fuck people who litter.
I was torn between laughing at SMASH and SMASH, or cringing that you had to choose between SMASH and SMASH.
that mouse pad is GARBAGE
&gt;Antifa are the REAL fascists.  Lol, that lame-ass line only works on Trumpies and people without access to a dictionary.
Those are fugly
You could even create a linux VM so you dont need to destroy your windows work. 
It looks like you made a community post! While everyone here at /r/lfg is happy to have you, make sure you have read, understand, and comply by rules [5 and 6](https://www.reddit.com/r/lfg/comments/5zspg7/rlfg_rules_and_communities/)!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/lfg) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Which in this instance is having ai level reactions to send that muthafucker back to hell
**Rokugani**"I think it's fine"**Rokugani**
Oh ok I just noticed teams from Spain can still sign, thanks.
I wondered that too. I think $50 was hype, but we're probably at a better real position now.
Advent Rising. The game set up some really cool ideas but it just didn't sell well.  Alan Wake. This game was perfect, in my eyes and it kills me that the sequel was canned.
You know, I've heard of you, but I couldn't remember what you were famous for. So my reaction was, "Oh, this is that Vargas guy! I've never seen one of his posts. Let's see what's so special about him."  I now know who you are, and I don't think I'll be forgetting it in a hurry.
Well fuck putting bethesda in the 5$ bin fuck em. No more money for you. They're worse the fuckin junkies ffs. 
Going to respectfully disagree about classical being the best type.  My daughters and I have symptoms of all the other types.  Maybe not has severe as each individual type, but combined -- it seriously sucks.
No idea if it's that specific, but it definitely does work.
An idea i've floated around in my head for a new support:  Sorta like a combination of Zenyatta and Zarya; This hero can put temporary 'bubbles' on allies. These bubbles would slightly reduce gravity for the hero, increase movement speed by like 10%, and would purify+make the hero temporarily immune to most CC.  This hero could also put these bubbles on enemies, which would cause the enemy to become almost *entirely* immune to gravity (maintaining their current momentum), while making them unable to walk nor use most mobility abilities, and temporarily preventing the enemy from being healed. So this could either be used to cause a fast-moving enemy to just uncontrollably *float away* into the distance, or to simply make a slower enemy float casually up into the air to be an easy target for allies.  I think a hero that plays with gravity could be a lot of fun, and this would add an additional character capable of both purifying and blocking heals.
This submission has been automatically removed because you did not include a question mark ("?") in your title. Reddit does not allow post titles to be edited, so if you would like, you can post the question again.  Please write your title in proper question format, and include a question mark, thank you.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Half of these people aren't even Texans and live in a magical world where you can force millions of people out of a city with no gridlock for days  -Randomguy176  This subreddit and bot are not in any way affiliated with the moderators of /r/The_Donald. Direct questions about removal to them.
2 bedroom using air con in Summer(Nov - March) and clothes dry very occasionally in Winter and I averaged $300 - $350 per quarter.
From what I can see in the photo, it's more likely the pyloric caeca.   It's usually near the junction of the stomach and intestine and it's thought to produce enzymes that aid in digestion or maybe help nutrient absorption. 
What? Do you have a reading or mental disorder?
Just to add to what you said. Apostasy comes in two forms, major and minor. Minor is basically a person leaving the faith in private whereas major is publicly leaving the faith and advocating for it. The latter form of apostasy however is a crime that is equated to treason to state and the ummah (all Muslims) and civil disobedience. Even today and in many Western nations, one of the punishments for treason is death. Similarly though, in classical Islamic jurisprudence, such severe punishments (hudd) are rarely given and are reserved for the worst of the worst. Minor apostasy has no punishment in courts as it is a personal issue between the individual and his Lord, after all, [there is no compulsion in religion.](https://quran.com/109)  u/WhyLater. 
Holy shit thats bad. I get 300fps on pre-remade maps and 200fps ish on remade ones.  And i have a ryzen 7 1700 and a gtx 1080
Not the Trans Pacific Partnership? What about the Trans Canada Trail?  edit: which is apparently now called the Great Trail? What the hell is that?
